# coding=utf-8
https://www.51voa.com/Words_And_Idioms_1.html
https://app.member.virginpulse.com/#/rewards/earn

===================================================================
https://www.coursera.org/?isNewUser=true
Wind1234!  Wind123$
lixiaozhan_615@me.com
Ministry of Testing ----  ?????apple?
http://www.kaosee.cn/plus/list.php?tid=58
Address: 16/F,Tower B, Wangjing Tower, No.9 Zhonghuan Nanlu, Chaoyang District, Beijing, P.R.China

Strong: S  N  L
Weak:   D  T  th
counting----couning
twentieth----twenieth
lightning     months---mons
=========================================================================
inspect   检查  查看
replica    复制品  拷贝 副本
An effective digital feedback loop functions like a brain
有效的数字反馈环路                    功能就像一个大脑
that constantly retrieves and analyzes information and then adjusts behavior accordingly.
不断获取 分析  信息                                      并相应的调整行为
digital feedback loop
 at a constant level   恒定的 稳定的水平
recur   复发  再发生 反复出现
Developers create code and tests that are managed by a version control system
After the application passes all tests, it is deployed to production, where it is continuously monitored for active cyber security threats
所有应用 通过所有测试                      部署到产品线
 Airport security checks passengers and luggage for problems before they board the aircraft, not after the plane is in the air.
 机场安检          检查旅客和行李                               登机前                           而不是飞机在空中的时候
prioritize    优先处理
gather, organize, and visualize data from different sources
搜集     组织         可视化数据
scrape information from the Internet   爬取信息
competitive landscape --- 竞争分析  竞争局面
bridge the gap between computer literates and illiterates
automakers are under pressure to cut electric vehicles' manufacturing costs
The goal is to make them cost as much as cars powered by gasoline.
extend the vehicle's driving range and its smoothness
in the automobile industry
to drive down e-axle manufacturing costs
human spaceflight
impressionable   易受影响的
shut out   关闭 排除 shut out the noise of commercial messages and become less materialistic
in the minds of their young children
brainwash   洗脑
The aim of the repetition of commercials on television is nothing
but to brainwash the consumers into compulsive consumption. ??????????????


be subject to  受制于 遵守
these activities are subject to international space law

commercial messages  广告
I just want to keep my coding skills sharp.
a burn  烧伤 烫伤
the heat of the surface even can burn her sole.   烫伤鞋底
burn your bridges 破釜沉舟

burn a hole in your pocket  无节制地花钱

burn the midnight oil   熬夜工作

After bugs have been prioritized, communicate details about the status of bugs with the team
high severity
downtime   宕机时间 故障时间

all but 几乎 差不多
Unexpected bursts of traffic are no longer an issue with cloud computing, and downtime is all but eliminated.

emulate  simulate   模拟
what input I provide to the box and what output I receive
navigate through this website  浏览网站
manipulate browser  操纵浏览器
from multiple angles, test coverage
conceal   隐瞒 隐藏
He tried to conceal the bad news from his wife , lest she worried.  lest 以防
First, there is black box testing, 黑盒测试
which means that the box is completely concealed and it is not possible to see inside of it.


abide by 遵守 abide by rules
sign off  签署

Listing 4. Testing an edge case: What if someone presses the button without typing in a word?  极端案例

Those five sections in the test strategy do a good job at setting expectations for what a QA will provide,
what resources are needed, how testing will be carried out, and which test will be performed

test account   测试账号
intelligent assistant  智能助手

on-demand 按需的 随时应变的
run against, run across  遇到
An example of test environments is that manual testing will be done in environments created on-demand.
Automation testing is run against a dedicated machine and across Mac and Windows using Chrome

 one-on-one  一对一的  set aside a few hours   home schooling 留出时间  家庭作业辅导
 We have had to discipline ourselves to set aside a few hours every weekday for some one-on-one home schooling.

Most impressive was the Shanghai sisters friendship, in order to let me quickly into them,  融入他们
I must transform into a Shanghai native.   转变成本地人

set expectations and check in on them regularly.  设定预期 经常检查

candid   直接的 坦率的 try to give candid feedback
align the feedback with how an individual is meeting up to their goals. 达到目标

solidify    solidify our position 加强 巩固
This usually happens with the help and collaboration of developers.

Traditionally, a QA has only gotten involved during the testing phase,
but it's proven really useful for a tester to get involved as early and as often as they can
to ensure quality throughout the entire development process.


excel  擅长做什么 excel at or excel in sth
A part of me thinks that for a child to really excel at a sport they'd have to give up some part of their childhood.


programming and scripting skills 编程和脚本技能
release or delivery manager

aptitude 天赋 能力    technical aptitude
Genius is nothing but a great aptitude for patience.


log in  登录

It is possible that through authentication,
a user can log in to a system but, through authorization, not be allowed to do anything.

hone in on sth
Start to hone in on the right price by running focus groups to get a sense of what customers are willing to pay.
focus groups  焦点人群

test functionality on both devices
testing time, testing scope, testing matrices, testing outcomes
prioritize  优先安排

Just as you prioritize the features that you support in your application, you should also prioritize the infrastructure.

depending on the browsers with highest usage or business revenue
use case  用例 --- test case
mind map   思维导图  can show connections between different components

correlate with  与什么关联 有关系
Profession and education level, however, does not always correlate with household income.

nail down 敲定细节  明确 约束

He added: "It is absolutely clear that Copenhagen must deliver a strong political agreement
and nail down the essentials. "

Always nail down the specifics of a deal in advance -- even with your friends and relatives.
敲定合同细节 提前

flag issues  ---   warning flag
stay relevant to users or customers  保持同步 与客户
under review and reform  正在评审和改革
a movie nominated for an award  电影 获得提名奖项
frontrunner 前线
on my way home from work  在从公司回家的路上
They run around my apartment and leave hair and dirt everywhere.
generous and forgiving  ---- have a heart

pull my leg -----  to joke with someone   开玩笑

blow your own horn    吹嘘 炫耀 宣传 brag

I have always said that you have to blow your own horn.
Because if you don't do it, who is going to do it for you?


When it rains, it pours. 屋漏偏逢连夜雨 倒霉的事情一件接一件
That's a lot of bad stuff happening.

My dog ate my homework, and my computer crashed. Even worse, I got sick that night! When it rains, it pours!


hit a wall 碰壁 撞南墙
When you hit a wall,just take a break and stop thinking about it.
lack of money, lack of mental energy
I just sit hours staring at the computer.

backlog   待办事项
acceptance criteria  可接受标准

finalize  最终敲定 定稿
He said he and Gates plan to meet again and will speak by telephone to finalize details in the coming days.

limit yourself to 限制自己的范围 区域 程度
If you choose to drink alcohol, limit yourself to no more than one or two drinks a day.

If the total number of open HTTP connections reaches the connection limit on an HTTP server,
you are likely to see timed-out connections.
so don't limit yourself to thinking that these are the only things that you can do with API

come down to 归纳起来 归根结底
a matter of preference 仁者见仁智者见智 个人喜好

Well, as I said at the beginning, it really does come down to a matter of preference. 确实是 可以归结为 个人喜好问题

mock out 模拟 模仿
This is critical to enable me to mock out the exchange rate so the tests can run without talking to the real exchange-rate server.


create a test double to take place of the real server

test doubles  测试替身 ========== stubs or mocks
switch over 切换到
switch over to the standby database to continue their work.
It's time to shift gear  换挡

underscore    下划线  强调
follow the instructions
hands-on experience  实际动手能力 经验
how it works and how we can do it in real life
dig into 挖掘
old enough to be served alcohol 到了喝酒的年龄
so let's summarize this 总结
figure out  想出方案 解决
political affiliation  政治立场
marital status  veteran status
bypass a law  绕过法律
raise concerns  引起关注
misplace 放错地方；错位；错放
result in wear-and-tear  引起磨损和折旧
politically charged 带有政治色彩的 政治上争议很大的
social media network includes coworkers and customers and his online profile, e-mail address
In today’s connected, digital world, it is almost impossible to truly separate our work and personal lives,
particularly on social media
disparage  蔑视；贬损；轻蔑
how your online behavior reflects on you and your employer
USB sticks 优盘 闪存盘
hard drives 硬盘  delivery person  快递员
phone technician      data breaches  资料泄露
a phishing site 钓鱼网站    phishing attempt/attacks  钓鱼攻击
back up every device  备份每个设备
nothing lasts forever  没有什么是持久的
SSDs can still go bad
ID badges can be faked    伪造
 by matching up the picture on your ID  对比ID上的照片
 privacy is often the driving force behind the need for security   隐私  推动力
 it should be protected at all times,from anyone
 mandate  授权 强制执行
 governance  管理；统治；统治方式；管理方式
 It is illegal to bribe foreign officials   贿赂
 a Chinese national （某国的）公民
corrupt payments 贪污的；受贿的；腐败的；营私舞弊的
evade  逃避；回避；躲避；逃脱  evade tax
 it applies to everyone  适用于每一个人  no one is exempt from this policy  无人豁免
 procurement （尤指为政府或机构）采购
 encourage a foreign official to misuse his position and privileges
 the action contravenes general rules of law    违反 抵触  违背
 follow through 坚持到底
If you write it down when you think of it, you are more likely to follow through on whatever it is.
不论什么事，只要你想起来的时候能写下来，你就很可能做完这件事
in order to secure a contract
The fact that an attempt was made is sufficient to violate the FCPA.
long-standing 存在已久的；悠久的
some real life examples of bribes that have led to prosecution
the trunk of a car 汽车后备箱
stuff  资料 东西 材料    作为动词的话---填充 塞满
big stuff 大件东西 大件物品
disguise  伪装 掩饰  也可以作为名词  伪装 掩饰
payments of bribes disguised as gifts are illegal
a corrupt government official was given a country club membership 俱乐部会员
there must be corrupt intent behind the gift giving   腐败意图 贿赂的意图   收受礼品
transporting 运送 Chinese government officials to popular tourist destinations 旅游景点

At a trade show, company employees maintain a booth, offering free pens, hats, and other lower cost promotional items.
The company also serves beverages and snacks at the booth. Some visitors to the booth are foreign officials.

Providing promotional items with company logos or free snacks are appropriate means of providing hospitality and promoting business
提供促销的物品 带着公司标志

bar tab  酒吧账单

authentication  and authorization  鉴权和认证
So in security you hear these two terms, and it's sometimes hard to distinguish exactly what they are.
But it's good for us to understand the difference between them.
So in essence, authentication is about verifying who you are, and authorization is about verifying what you can do.

run into some difficulties   ????
physical development  ????
To continue to advance your skills with test automation, spend more time learning about and writing automated tests.
A good sign of this is having higher productivity and being able to spend less time on each release
 because more of the checks are automated.
Take note of which bugs were discovered from test automation
A goal of automation is to help catch bugs quicker and ideally before a release.
it is beneficial to discuss what problem automation tends to solve
offer nice report to visualize coverage
to ensure a more robust test suite
 Parallelizing tests?????? allows many tests to be run concurrently, which dramatically reduces the total time it takes to run.
address the failed tests(??)        mitigate
run tests in a dedicated environment that is not interfering with other people
select what to automate      suit your team needs
create a scale
I will sum them to get the total
how easy it will be to write the test script
add an item to cart
what will the effect be to customers?   the probability of use
how often will this feature be used by customers?
clear out cart  清空购物车
These few weeks of rest and relaxing has allowed me to clear out my head and reset my brain.

start over 重新开始
sticker   便利贴 贴纸
sit down with your teammates and write down as many scenarios as you can think of
run tests often and ensure they are passing
test components (which are) working together,
find the tools that seem best suited for the job
There is no one solution that can solve all your team's needs
it can be tough for a team to come to or reach consensus about selecting an automation framework
 Going back to the test pyramid, it's good to have the most number of unit tests,
 a medium number of integration tests,
 and a small number of UI tests.
Test automation will evolve over time 随着时间演变
There  will always be room for maintenance and improvement  维护和改进的空间
get involved in test automation
on-going effort   持续的努力
when the whole team is invested in the test automation process, robust and well maintained test suite
one size fits all ----- 一刀切的
To sum up: while there might not be a "one size fits all" solution to build automation,
new tools being developed seem to come close.

This is a model I follow in most projects, but one size does not fit all
This will help you address what is working well with automation test and what can be better
I recommend getting together as a group every few months for retrospective.
 will help ensure that all stakeholders are in agreement about the strategy for automation testing going forward
what types of test to implement
representatives of developers, testers and business stakeholders
open and shutdown the browser, cpu usage goes up to 100%
simulate user behaviour by doing
It takes time to start the server, send a request, wait for the response,
and confirm that response is successful.
the response should have the status of 200 indicating that the connection is successful
integration test should cover cross module processes   跨模块阶段
unit test focuses on individual small parts, integration test focuses on the whole.
It helps to structure test in an organized way
Now I want to take a deeper dive into unit test
consider the pros and cons  考虑优缺点
They are extremely valuable because they test end-to-end workflows and user actions,like clicking and typing.
test pyramid is visual representation
there are many different types of tests that are either automated or manual.
as your team does planning,development and releases.
it is all circumstantial ----  conditional   有条件的
These tests measure data which can then be analyzed,quantified,and visualized in some way.
usability testing   可用性测试
exploratory testing    探索性
quadrant 象限     involve
whether or not things are working as expected   ---- 是否如预期
sort the jobs      sort them out   整理
schedule your job  安排 规划工作
Jenkins has a much better visual effect than CLI  比较好的视觉效果
case sensitive     大小写敏感
as the name implies  --- 正如名字所指
We'll take a look at the console log.
All your plugins are up to date   插件都是最新的
Back to the menu on the left, you'll find
In these cases, it's best to have Jenkins installed on a server that can be accessed over the network
It can be available to multiple users.
Once everything is set up appropriately
that are most commonly used by
Once the installation completes, you will be prompted to unlock Jenkins  --- 提示解锁
scroll down the page until you see the reviews
You'll need at least 256 megabytes of RAM and 1 gigabytes of disk space
Plugins are a software package that can extend Jenkins' core functionality.
start a build  or build a project
We'll be referring to project and job in this chapter.    refer to 参考 提到
practice the techniques that we learned in last chapter
For the new exercise files
they are colored green
It is telling us about changes that are in between those files
--- minus minus
+++ plus plus
It tells us that--- what this is telling us is that
go into the text editor and let's make some changes to the first file
staging area    暂存区
screenshot   snapshot  截图 截屏
For bugs, it is often helpful to attach a screenshot of the problem, or a related e-mail discussion.

I make changes on my hard drive  硬盘
write commit message in present tense but not past tense  一般现在时  过去式
keep each line to less than 72 characters ---每行不超过72个字符
-m   dash m
" "  inside quotes 双引号
how to install Git on the Linux operating system.
I've got it here on the desk
must have network access to submit our changes
Individual developers clone a master repository, and submit pull requests to the owner of that repository for inclusion.

master repository  主仓库
keep in sync with 与 什么同步
out of sync with
Git does not work that way, it is a distributed version control system.
override this function  重写函数
represent it in string form   以字符串的形式呈现
as always    和往常一样   as usual
Just working out with Bill five times a week. Same as always.

keep your Python programming skills up to date by reading this website.
feel free to reach out to me here on LinkedIn.
the if statement  is also called predicate expression  --- 条件语句也就是if语句
the set however only contains unique values, so none of these values are duplicated.  集合 不同的数值  不重复
write another for loop named --- for 循环
key colon value  --- key:value  冒号
predicate condition  ---
customize the message output depending on your needs.  自定义消息输出 根据需求
In a production environment that is not what we want,we would want that log sent to a separate file.
Error messages indicate that something unexpected happened or that a more serious problem might be approaching.
we like to be straight forward with you and your company.   坦诚相待

track down the origin of the problem --- 追踪问题根源
so let's try these out on some code     试验  try sh out
so down here I will ---  be equal to
And to do that I need to add another decorator function.
you can see it's printing out the value that's associated with the key.
enumeration  枚举
increase the readability of your code,  more readable  增加可读性
and much more  ---
customize   自定义 客户定制的
The ability to customize logging like this provides a great deal of flexibility and control over the Linux environment.

intersection  交集
Each cell shows an intersection of two modules and a count of the dependencies between them.
单元    依赖

This expression creates a dictionary that initializes items to an empty string.
The last one    we'll take a look at    is called deque.
They can be specified to have a maximum length.    指定
iterate over   this list or array   循环 遍历
loop over ------循环 遍历
refer to as  被称为
they are referred to as lambda functions
suppose----假设 suppose we have a function
change the function to take an argument like a  ---带一个参数
variable argument  list 可变参数列表
function that can take variable number of parameters  ----带可变数量的参数
documentation 文档 in a documentation
document  记录 证明
It is the first time the technique has been used to document how the brain processes grammar and produces words.
bonafide   善意的 可靠的
tokens  代币；代金券；赠券
pay for business-class airfares 商务舱机票   first class 头等舱
I'm only a student, and I can only afford an economic class ticket  支付得起经济舱机票
to curry favor with sb  讨好某人
Avoid gifts of cash or cash equivalents    Don’t transform business trips into vacations
pharmaceutical   制药的；配药的；卖药的 company  make a sizeable donation
He's going to be a bonafide rebounder , night in and night out, and a lot of his scoring is through sheer effort.
他会是一个十分可靠的篮板手，是的，每个晚上都是如此。他的得分中，有很大一部分纯粹是来自他的拼劲。
at the request of a foreign official  应外国官员的要求
facilitating payment  疏通费 加速办事付给官员的钱
expedite  加快；加速 促进；使加速；发送
reimburse  reimbursement  报销；付还；赔偿
requisite 必需的；必备的；必不可少的  也可名词 必需品   necessary
a precondition for gaining entry into a market or obtaining a contract is illegal 获得市场准入 赢得合同
discretion   谨慎 慎重 自由裁量权
Although the license is routinely granted, the licensing agency does have the discretion to deny it.
 environmental permit 环保许可
 Sportswear or skincare, the bottom line remains: will Chinese consumers pay the same for a local brand as a foreign one?
无论是运动服还是护肤品，归根结底还是这句话：中国消费者会愿意为一个国产品牌支付与外资品牌同等的价格吗？
Limit expenses to those that are necessary and reasonable  限制花费 必须的 合理的
advance  预付款  或者动词 预付 提前
advance funds  提前付款
rebate  折扣  退税
issuer  发行机构 出版者
domestic concerns 国内单位
foreign nationals   外国人
Do I qualify for a rebate and how much can I expect?
我有资格获得退税么？我能够享受多少
network and data breaches through phishing attacks  网络 数据泄露  钓鱼攻击
if you are not aware, you could click on a malicious link that takes u to a fake website
or that installs malicious software on your machine--both of which are common ways for criminals to steal your private data
paranoid 多疑的；恐惧的；患偏执症的；有妄想狂的    也可名词 偏执狂；妄想症患者
security awareness
using internet,email and social media which are already a part of our personal and professional lives now
PII: personally identifiable information
The internet has made it much easier to collect PII. contact and locate a single person
ubiquitous 似乎无所不在的；十分普遍的
security in our everyday lives can easily be grouped into three categories:personal,professional and mobile.
Personal information includes how we manage our social media accounts and sensitive information about our families and close friends.
Professional privacy has to do with our employers,co-workers,clients and government organizations
Mobile privacy is the intersection between personal and professional;the method by which we communicate
when we are away from home and work,traveling, and anytime we share data through our ubiquitous mobile devices.
skepticism  怀疑主义
social security or national ID number
why does this app want access to your contacts
you must be cautious about what you post on social networks
you are on the front lines of defense     be at risk
more and more prevalent  越来越普遍
connectivity is available to us wherever we go,from coffee shops and airports,to gyms and school campuses.
it does not matter if you are using WiFi or mobile data via your data service provider
we are constantly connected.
learning how to identify and avoid SMS phishing attacks   学会识别 防止 SMS钓鱼攻击
Often back up smartphone data to the cloud   经常备份数据到云端
use unique logins for all of your online accounts
use a password manager to keep track of it
remember that less is always best when it comes to sharing
protect your information from bad guys
sharing machinery  共享机制  using encryption 采用加密机制
have them stolen 被盗窃
keep your devices up to date,just as you would your laptop or desktop
always use a VPN when connecting to public networks
reduce the threat of privacy invasion 侵犯隐私
leak data to bad guys 泄露数据


So let's go ahead and run this, all right, and you can see that using this function,
dropwhile will ignore the first few values, right,
until it reaches the 40 trigger point, at which point it starts returning the rest of the values.
 Takewhile however returns the first few values until that 40 value is triggered, at which point it just stops giving you data.

some of them are lower case and others are upper case.
comment out these lines
The practice of looping over sequences of values is very common in Python.
come in handy 派上用场
negligent  疏忽的；造成过失的；放松的；随便的  negligence
birthdate    and   national ID number
when you are granted access to confidential data,systems and other secured areas of our organizations,
you become responsible for that access.It's your job to ensure your access is never compromised and that data
is never leaked for any reason
intent and severity may vary  程度和严重性 carry equal amount of risk
put simply. has the potential to harm our organization

They come in handy very often.
It has come in handy for me many times when I am trying to get out the door and found a pocket ripped or a button loose.
be under immense pressure to reach a deadline set by a high-profile client.

embrace opportunity  抓住机会
placeholder   --占位符
you should indent your code with four spaces instead of tab.
be equivalent to  ???
concatenate 2 strings   连接字符串
It probably comes as no surprise to you that string formatting
is one of the most common things that Python programmers have to do.

The ideal candidate must have extensive and advanced knowledge on web scraping and data mining.
广泛的 深入的  网页爬取  数据挖掘

 He crafts an exceptional read, which progresses from the basics of Python all the way to automating daily operations that make your life easier.
  I encourage you to continue learning how to create automation in Python.
  The addition of this skill will not only transform how you approach problems but also prepare you for what's to come in a world built on automation.
 I wish you the best of luck!

 Python is an easy-to-learn programming language that allows organizations to script custom automation and reap the time-savings
 how to automate your own repetitive tasks using Python

in-depth workflow  有深度的
They go very in-depth
API developers like to inspect who is calling their APIs  调用API
paired with   与 什么结对
package sth with sth  打包在一起
match up with ----- 与什么相匹配
base feature  基本特性
construct my requests   构造请求
Politely point out how that doesn't match up with what you were expecting, and ask if the agent could check again.
有礼貌的指出
I'm just trying to match up with you today. You are looking pretty good there. -
print it to the console    打印到串口
suspicion   怀疑
Great, I will go ahead and check
reinvent the wheel ------ 重复造轮子
forgone conclusion
APIs act as an intermediary for 2 pieces of software.  中间人 调解人  中介

Susanna had worked as the assistant manager in the store for three years.
When the boss decided to take a job with another company,
most of us assumed Susanna would be getting a promotion.
It seemed a foregone conclusion.
But our predictions were wrong. A new manager with more experience was hired instead.


Who will win the presidential election this year is far from a foregone conclusion.

fast and furious  快速的 大量的  纷至沓来
Once his name was announced on television, attention on him was fast and furious.

The residents in Alaska are used to bad weather in winter.
But they weren't prepared for all the snow they recently got.
That's because the storm moved in fast and furious.
Within a few short hours, towns became overwhelmed by mountains of snow.


damage control  伤害控制
There were some doubts about whether Drake would be an effective Union president.
Then, he made a racial remark in a speech at an assembly.
At first, he ignored critics.
Later, he tried to make a joke of it before deciding to offer a public apology.
In the end, his attempts at     damage control     weren't successful.
He lost out on the promotion.

who has a sunny personality. He can cheer me up when I'm moody.  阳光的性格     鼓励我 情绪低落
We say "eat, drink and be merry." 吃  喝   玩

FF: Eat, drink and be merry. Gosh! This is my motto in life!  座右铭

It's a small world! ---- means surprise

haste makes waste   欲速则不达
Haste makes waste. You've got to do it step by step. 脚踏实地

When studying, don't forget that Rome wasn't built in a day.
Haste makes waste. Only practice makes perfect.

The idiom is a bit like the English proverb "Haste makes waste" ------to spoil things by excessive enthusiasm.

From my own experience, I draw a painful lesson HASTE MAKES WASTE.

Wise people know that haste makes waste, that silence is golden, and that it is better to look before you leap.


window dressing   弄虚作假

She was telling me how much she has changed but I think it's just window-dressing. Underneath she's the same. 仍然没变

At least the stock is doing great.    股票表现很好 It's down 5 points from yesterday. 自从昨天开始下降5个点了

Cross that bridge when one comes to it, 传到桥头自然直

Carrie is determined to move to New York City next fall.
At the moment, she doesn't know what she's going to do for a job once she gets there.
Still, she's not worried. She says that she will cross that bridge when she comes to it.
The way she figures it, she'll be able to find work after she gets settled.

crack down   打击
For months, motorists had been speeding down Main Avenue.
They caused a number of accidents including pedestrians being hit. 引起交通事故 造成行人撞伤
That's when more police officers were assigned to enforce the law. 分配去执法
It's worked. Since we cracked down on speeding, there have been fewer problems. 见效了 起作用了  打击

I know the employee manual says that we only have an hour for lunch.
But once in a while I have an errand to run and I get back a few minutes late to the office. 处理一些杂事 琐事 回来晚点
My new boss is so strict about the rules.
She's taking notes on anyone who's not at his desk on time. 没有准时回到工位
She's really cracking down on us.


close to home
M.A.D.D. is an organization committed to stopping drunk driving and supporting victims of this terrible crime. 酒驾
It was started in 1980 by a mother who had strong feelings about such issues.
Her daughter had been killed by a repeat drunk driver.  醉酒驾驶员
As with many of MADD's members, this tragedy is very close to home.

The TV program is showing the life in rural areas. 展示贫困地区生活
I know they just want to attract people's attention and raise money for people in need. 吸引注意力  筹钱给穷人
For me, it is close to home. Because when I was a little boy, my family was very poor
and I remember all the ridicule I suffered years ago.

ridicule   奚落 嘲讽  名词 或者动词
Good communication is the basis of trust in front of him,
you are going to express deep thoughts and not subjected to ridicule or harm.
良好沟通的基础是信任，在他面前，你确信不会因为表达内心深层想法而遭受到嘲笑或伤害。

be subjected to 遭受 受到
He said, "Some of these crew members may be subjected to the physical and mental torture. "
他说，“这些船员中有些人可能经受了身体和精神上的折磨

Caught in the middle  被夹在中间  左右为难
Her husband gets caught in the middle whenever there's a conflict between his mom and his wife.


brush off  拒绝
brush sb off
my friend shouldn't brush off the poor ratings of that car.
I have been telling my husband to see a dentist for his bad teeth, but he keeps brushing me off.


Big fish in a small pond     小地方的大人物 宁做鸡头 不做凤尾
he has no interest in living in large, competitive cities. He'd rather be a big fish in a small pond.

Of the 60 students in her graduating class, Tania ranked number one. She received many honors,
including a scholarship to one of the top universities in the country.
Once there, Tania found it difficult adjusting to classmates who were all as talented as she was.
That's because she had been used to being a big fish in a small pond.


year-round 全年的
feast or famine     It is feast or famine  闲的时候闲死 忙的时候忙死
every inch  完全的 彻底的
They're every inch a national treasure.
She's every inch a Hollywood legend

on the double 十万火急 加倍 加速  get over here on the double

go for broke 孤注一掷 放手一搏
I decided to go for broke and started my own business

what's the catch  有什么猫腻
It sounds too good to be true, what's the catch?

It sounds like a great idea, but what's the catch?

his price is too incredible to believe. What's the catch?

she has had some problems with her family, and
let's cut her some slack  放她一马 不要把人逼得太紧了 不要过分施压

under the gun  在巨大压力下
feel stressed out and under pressure.

cross my fingers   祈祷 祝福
I have my fingers crossed that my project will be going smoothly

come a long way 取得很大进步  走过很长的路
Technology has come a long way compared to 10 years ago.
you'll need to come a long way from how you performed today.

come clean 坦白从宽
It's always best to come clean.

churn out 批量生产
I would much prefer a good story than something churned out by the millions.

Unlike something big and expensive, a cupcake is a small treat anyone can afford
chain reaction   连锁反应

a case in point   典型的例子
A case in point was her belief in     living here and now  活在当下

People assume that the super wealthy live extravagant lifestyles. 奢华的生活方式
But you can find exceptions. My cousin is a case in point.
He's worth several million dollars. 身价数百万
Still, he drives the same used car he's had for years, rents a modest apartment, 然而 开破车 租中等公寓
and donates most of his money to charity. 捐款给慈善机构

the end of the line 终点 尽头   多指坏人的下场
From the early 1920s to 1931, he made a fortune smuggling and producing liquor. 靠走私发财
He reached the end of the line, not from those activities,
but from trying to avoid paying taxes. 不交税
His career was over when the government finally convicted him and sent him to prison. 指控他并送去监狱

When I was a kid, my dad and I used to go fishing at the river near our house.
Then we started to notice that there wasn't much to catch anymore.
The end of the line came when officials declared that the water was badly polluted.
Nobody could enjoy it.


carbon copy  一模一样的复制品 形容很像的事务 He is a carbon copy of his father
I want something unique,but not a carbon copy.
Our business competitor launched a carbon copy of our project. I bet they've got our ideas somewhere?


it is business as usual   和往常一样  例行公事  照例
Imagine preparing breakfast for six kids.
Then getting them washed and dressed, packing their lunches and getting them off to school.
That might seem like a huge challenge.
But for my wife and me, it's business as usual. It's part of our everyday routine. 日常生活的一部分

a black hole  黑洞 可以形容某些事情没完没了 they feel they're lost in a black hole.
This year's conference took place at a brand new facility.
There must have been at least 8,000 people there.
That was far too big for me. I don't like such a black hole.
You meet people that you never see again because it's so huge.
 I prefer a much smaller site. There are greater chances for running into people that I recognize.

I feel I am lost in a black hole.

loophole  法律上的漏洞
=======
born with a silver spoon in his(her) mouth   嘴里含着金钥匙出生  形容出生家庭好
Everyone said that he was born with a silver spoon in his mouth,
but actually he acquired his fortune through many years of hard work. 取得财富


pioneering    ---- 开创性的
communications networks     --- 通信网络
ripe    ---成熟的

 market cap   市值
but have no voting power. 投票权

When the tech bubble popped, the company’s market cap fell all the way to $10 million  技术泡沫破灭 市值下降到
and the employee base of over 500 was shrunk to 87.

with screenshots and step-by-step instructions  截图 指导


go easy on sb or sth  对某人和善 友好 少量用某东西

I know he made a mistake, but go easy on him.  对他好点
That's why she's been going easy on the salt when she cooks or eats out. ???

give and take     取舍
It's natural for couples to argue once in a while. 情侣偶尔吵架 很正常
But whether those two people will have a long future together
often depends on how well they work out their differences. 怎么处理分歧
Conflicts shouldn't always be about one person being right and the other wrong. 冲入不一定是 一个人对 另一个错
There has to be a healthy give and take. Without that ability to negotiate, couples can't survive.
正确的取舍  否则 没有无法协调能力  不能长久

When you grow up in a strong family, you learn how to behave, you learn about give and take.


Ignorance is bliss 无知便是福 傻人有傻福
Warning: Sometimes ignorance is bliss; after gaining this knowledge,
you may be hurt when it is obvious that someone is lying to you.


wait for the other shoe to drop   等待靴子落地 提心吊胆地等待最后的结果
Business is bad so the firm has to fire 100 employees. They've already announced the first 50,
and now the rest of us are waiting for the other shoe to drop.

go overboard   太过分 走极端
Don't go overboard. They might be good, but I'm sure they're not the best movies ever.
During festivals, it's easy to go overboard with calories and consumption.


put down roots  定居 安顿下来
I am ready to put down roots in this community.


firing on all cylinders  火力全开 马力全开 全力以赴
The problem isn't that Microsoft isn't firing on all cylinders,
it's that this performance isn't reflected in the stock's price.  性能没有反映在股价上


He is a real home bird. He seldom takes part in the social events.

home bird  宅男宅女

cabin fever     幽闭症  宅人 长期不出门
He is such a home bird that I wonder if he will suffer from cabin fever.
Sounds you got cabin fever.

No ifs,ands or buts   没有任何例外
Just do it as I say. No ifs,ands or buts.
There will be no ifs,ands or buts in this matter.


pig out    大吃一顿 大快朵颐
Look at all this food. I am going to pig out!


sponge,  sponge off sb 占便宜
A sponge soaks up the water all around it. 海绵吸收水
A sponger soaks up gifts, food and money without working.

The brain is acting a bit like a sponge;
it can soak up new information and change to make room for it, a concept known as plasticity.

He is always sponging other people. 经常占别人便宜
Last week I paid for his parking and he has not paid back yet. 替他付钱停车 还没还钱
He is an old sponge.


significant other----partner   多指另一半 情侣
You have a significant other. Since when?
Bring my significant other.


To get up to speed   赶上进度；熟悉了解新项目的详细情况；跟上速度
I started holding these meetings in January as a way for everyone
to get up to speed on    what everyone else is doing.
After returning from his vacation, Nicholas had to work hard to get up to speed at his job.
结束假期返回工作岗位后，尼古拉斯得努力工作，好尽快进入状态。


beat around the bush   旁敲侧击
Don't beat around the bush. Tell me exactly what you think is wrong with my work.


in the nick of time   非常及时
He's right. Don't you remember last time ?
You were almost late, but we helped you out  in the nick of time.
You reminded me in the nick of time. 非常及时的提醒了我


long shot    概率很小的事  篮球上的远投
It may be a long shot to get a car plate this year.    car plate 车牌


come rain or shine   风雨无阻
Come rain or shine, you will always find him in the pub every Friday night.


call it a day     到此为止  今天就结束吧
I have been working on this project for the past 15 hours.
I think it is time to call it a day.


split hairs     吹毛求疵；钻牛角尖；斤斤计较
Let's not split hairs, it is not worth it.


take someone under your wing-----help or guide someone, protect someone

not in the cards  不太可能
in the cards   可能发生；可能的   多半会发生的
If long travel is not in the cards, at least take some trips or get outdoors.

keep someone at arm's length-----keep a social distance with someone

======================================================================================

determined course,  forgo----quit,  decouple with    解耦合

The country's strategic shift puts China at a more determined course of forgoing export-led growth for "domestic circulation,"
which could also include its decoupling with the U.S. and other Western countries

Beijing will be pursuing a development plan
focused on domestic consumption in preparation for the "worst case scenario" in the coronavirus crisis.

the country has to be more self-sufficient after the economy suffered a huge blow in the first quarter of 2020
economy contracted 6.8%  , contract=====decline,drop
to power its growth
We now have to seek development in a more unstable and uncertain world

show better-than-expected resilience     好于预期的弹性

fast-tracked-------it means speed up
Xi also said China's biotechnology developments must be fast-tracked   加快进度
as its new growth point in this pandemic when a vaccine is crucial to stop the virus.  疫苗很关键 阻止病毒


weather through==== go through  经历 安全度过（困难时期）
Furthermore, your classmates provide the motivation and encouragement
as you weather through a very difficult and challenging situation.

Beijing-based independent economist Hu Xingdou, however, warned China must not go back to the command economy,
where the central government controls what goods must be produced and sold, instead of allowing a free market.
The economist also said China has to assure the world
it will not make drastic economic changes as it weathers through this adversity.

panel  仪表盘 专家组
has gone viral,  rushing  火了  非常流行
A new security tool has gone viral across the U.S. already,
here’s why millions of computer owners are rushing to claim their’s today

Having any of your private information stolen or posted online would be devastating!
But beware, it happens to more people than you might think: on average 1 in 4 people are hacked every day

less is more  少即是多

1.skin deep      --beauty is only skin deep. 肤浅的
inflate price  涨价
Hotels often inflate prices at particular times of the year.


2.cosmetic surgery --- 整形手术

3.radiance and charm

4.What is a beauty , someone with almond-shaped eyes, fleshy lips, lean body , blooming breasts, wasp-waist, and long legs?


5.You know what it's like to have one tiny canker sore on your tongue. It hurts, it affects your appetite and makes you feel real miserable.


A cut caused by biting the cheek or tongue, or reactions from hot foods or beverages may contribute to canker sore development.

You have got excessive internal heat and you should drink more water and cool tea, or you will suffer canker sore


6.susceptible to  对…敏感；对…敏感的；容易受到…的

But what we don't know is why they become susceptible to this host of pathogens, viruses and fungus.

After all, if the government will never allow you to fail due to the problems the public would face,
then you cannot be treated like other firms, since you are not susceptible to failure.

7.Though there is still a gap between your rock-bottom prices and my expectations, I am willing to sign contracts with you.

8.repercussion     反响 影响
The learning type organization theory has evoked intense repercussion all over the world especially in business circles.
激起了很大的反响
9.stipulate         规定 明确要求
The contract would stipulate reimbursements at any point the engagement is called off.  订婚 约会 约定

Can you stipulate they would carry out the treaty?

10. liberalization        自由化

How would a new round of trade liberalization help poor countries?

New steps should be made in trade facilitation and liberalization to boost the integration of the three economies.

11.fellowship      友谊 奖学金

12.resort    圣地 景点

Hawaii is an all-the-year-round tourist resort.

Whether as a child or as an adult, nearly everyone has had a food allergy at one time or another.

13. She got the highest score in fancy diving.      花式跳水

The teacher's story titillated the fancy of the pupils.

In my younger days girls never went in for cosmetics and fancy dresses.

14. There we received several weeks of intensive training.

15. smug adj.  沾沾自喜的 自鸣得意的 自命不凡的

energy-efficient technology  节能技术

energy-efficient buildings

fuel-consumption 燃油消耗

fuel consumption    reduce fule consumption 降低燃油消耗

16. window shade n. 百叶窗 遮光窗帘
detached house   独栋别墅
peak season  旺季 light season  淡季

furnish with  装备 提供

afford, prepare, serve, tender, lend

historical fans  历史迷
But policy and legislation can only go so far. 只能走到这么远

Because if you look at that window glass, it's not in equilibrium.

For me, cycling is both a sport and a hobby   运动  爱好

17. How much is still due on your car?   还要付多少钱

When does the bill fall [become] due? 什么时候到期

18. margin n.  边缘  回旋的余地

So it was not so difficult, but of course we needed to be careful that if something did go wrong, we at least had some margin.

This is about honor and morality.  荣誉和道德  道义 品行

I want to know how much time is taken up in extracurricular activities , homework and housework in your class.
课外活动 家庭作业 家务事 占用了多少时间
He took the extracurricular lessons his parents chose. He applied to the secondary school they recommended.
申请了中学
Animals do not have this morality.

draw

How do you perceive the morality of career?

What if I overdraw?   透支

Then, how much can I overdraw from my personal ordinary card?

Bill? In fact, could I ask you for the recipe?


The doctor's treatment gave no relief to the patient.

sentence  --

The haze has burnt away.   烟雾消散了

But then you peer into the Chinese haze - and despair.

Everyone is talking this week about the smog in Beijing, which got me wondering: Many of the things I buy,
from my kids' toys to my washing machine, come from China.

The crowds surge out of the sports stadium.

The former Chievo striker is willing to take a pay-cut if it would mean going back to the Olimpico Stadium with Lazio.

20. tablet --- n.  药片  平板电脑

tribute -----n.  贡品

21. texture ----n.  质地 纹理

Gather some leaves 树叶 which have an interesting texture and shape.

The match ended in a draw.    平局收场

That didn’t matter so much 20 years ago when personal computers were few and far between , but times have changed.
个人电脑很少见  20年前  时代已经变了

22.Such initiative is highly commendable.   主动性  难能可贵 值得称赞

At least we have taken the first step here to communicate with one another, which is commendable.  值得表扬

I put it all down to his hard work and initiative.   把所有归结于他的努力工作和进取心 主动性

In this way they brought into full play the initiative, wisdom and power of the masses.
他们以这种方式充分发挥主动性，群众的智慧和力量

23 Team up with her    与谁配合  组队

to team up with

team up with sb

In fact, Apple has been eager to team up with state-run telecom companies, 国有电信企业
which control the all-important mobile phone subscriptions.  控制   订购

client base   客户基础 customer base

The study compares the energy demand and carbon emission figures of the three scenarios with baseline figures from 2005.
能源需求  碳排放     基准线
In Copenhagen, experts and officials alike are putting the emphasis on what people and governments can do to cut the emission of greenhouse gases.

stop at nothing to  maintain power ---to get what he wants

stop at nothing   毫无顾忌；什么都做得出；不择手段；什么也做得出   未达目的 不择手段

to stop at nothing to do sht

Westley's willing to pay big money to get his hands on the sign and will stop at nothing to ensure he wins the bid. 赢得投标

not only is she beautiful, she's also a talented, hard-nosed 顽强不屈的 reporter who will stop at nothing to get to the bottom of a story.  揭露事情的真相

However, several days ago, there was news that our courtyard house will be pulled down to make room for high-rise office buildings.
拆除庭院  为高层建筑  腾地方
alarming----adj.令人惊慌的；引起恐慌的 令人担忧的

against one's will----违背意愿

I dare not look at myself in the mirror, let alone hold out my hand to shake hands with others.
更别说 伸手 去和别人握手
Many people fear 害怕 that the real estate bubble will burst and have devastating effects.      property market 房地产泡沫 灾难性影响

The skyscrapers 摩天大楼 do not relate to their cities that much. They do provide a city an iconic image.   标志性的形象

What iconic brands come to mind when you look around your space? 代表性的品牌

astronomical ----adj.

astronomical number  天文数字 形容数字巨大

top up -- top-up card 加满 充值

If it fails to inflate , or you need to top up the air , blow into this tube.
move from rural to urban areas

one classic example----

unprecedented rise   前所未有的增长
unprecedented achievement
unprecedented boom
natural user interface   自然人机界面

It also sets world migration records---not in terms of immigration in and out of the country  创造了世界迁徙纪录
but migration from rural to urban areas.

the rise of construction industry in China.   建筑产业

fillet-----fillet a fish means taking bones out.   无骨肉片；去骨鱼片 也可以动词 剔去（鱼、肉的）骨头；把（鱼、肉）切成片
fish fillet

boneless fillet  去骨的鱼片

gut and scale------

scales-----鱼鳞  sink---水槽

The scales will fly off in all directions----四处乱飞

24.She cooks and washes everyday.
I walk back after work everyday.

The girl helps her mother to wash up after dinner everyday.  洗盘子洗碗

The rainwater dripped through a crack on the ceiling.   雨水沿着房顶的裂缝低落下来

Academic Transcript 成绩单

Here the crowd was thickest and most enthusiastic.   这里人群密集 最有激情

And not only that, people just like to be around enthusiastic people in general.  喜欢聚在有激情的人周围

Enthusiastic people also love what they do, regardless of money or title or power. 不在乎钱 头衔 权力

But what the dollar will buy, how much it will buy, does vary. 买什么 能买多少

varied-----变化的

His opponent couldn't stand up to his varied and fast-changing tactics. 不能适应 快速变化的战术

For millennia, technology has been an essential part of the framework for imagining and moving into the future,
but the specific technologies chosen have varied.

Most appropriate for indexes are sites (or parts of sites) that do not change too frequently, that have repeat users,
and that have rich and varied content.

receipt---   收条
woolen-   羊毛的
screen off  隔开 屏幕关闭 beautiful views like hills and mountains

large stall  大排档     catalyst  催化剂

market stall   摊位；街市台位

front stall      spiral   螺旋式上升（或下降）；盘旋上升（或下降）；急剧增长   动词 名词 形容词都可以
in live environments   现网  实际环境

Nonetheless, many of his regular customers, including some of the best sushi chefs and their apprentices,
have already visited his stall, seen the tuna, and placed their orders.

radically   根本地；彻底地
involuntary-----adj. 非自愿的 不由自主的  无意识的
shrink development and test times  缩短开发和测试时间
rapid deployment of updates,patches and new functionality
supply chain  供应链   new spectrum 新的频谱       in shorter timeframes  在较短的时间窗口
requiring a higher degree of automation
lowering operation costs   降低运营成本
human-centric   以人为中心的         device-centric     vendor  卖主；厂商；卖方
 As 5G networks are rolled out across the globe   推出 产品
 Development and testing is still ongoing and the current plan is start the roll-out in the beginning of August.
开发和测试仍在进行中，目前的计划是开始在八月初推出。
scale out  向往扩展  指商业扩张
staying compliant with regulations through minimization of downtime, and managing or reducing operational costs
符合监管        通过 降低宕机时间       管理 或者降低运营成本
to maximize its system resiliency     最大化系统弹性
this will be easily deployable    容易部署
acronym     缩写词；缩写字   analog signals   模拟信号     digital signals
 higher download speeds   较高的下载速度
  They require very low latency and run on 5G      需要很小的延迟   运行在5G网络上
  qualitatively     从质量方面看
  5G is like an automobile as opposed to a single horse      as opposed to 和什么相比
  service providers  服务提供商
  adaptive capability  自适应能力    fuse together  融合在一起
  Siri is an example of AI in a pocket device.  口袋设备  装在口袋里的设备 多指电子产品
  It can recognize voice queries, give relevant answers to questions, send messages, and make calls.
  识别语音查询     提供对应的回答                                         发送消息   打电话
  It can perform tasks normally performed by humans     执行任务  通常由人来完成的任务
  cloud-native development   云部署
  especially high levels of data storage and computing power without direct management by the user.
高层次的数据存储                               计算能力         不需要人的直接管理  操作

all necessary software can be combined into one executable package,  所有必须的软件都能被组合在一个可执行包里
 which runs in a virtualized environment     运行在虚拟环境
 What once took hours or days now takes minutes    以前需要几小时或者几天的 现在只需要几分钟
 infinite resources   无限的资源      finite 有限的
 durable    耐用的 持久的     耐用品
be able to package and isolate applications     打包  隔离 应用

People with this problem experience sudden, involuntary leg movements during the night,
such as kicking or jerking.
overdo --- 过多使用 用过头了 夸张  做得过分

It is very important not to overdo it at any stage of the game.

Breakfast may be the most important meal of the day, but it’s possible to overdo it.

The market is great. Every owner, salesperson, sales assistant,
and even the customers are very friendly and helpful.
It is open Monday to Friday from 9:00 a.m. till 6:00 p.m.,
Saturday from 8:00 a.m. till 4 p.m.

26.food stand ---- a night market food stand   夜市摊位

With this minimal capital, I can run a small curbside food stand in Shihlin area.

The term "take-out" describes both a style of eating and a growing list of prepared foods  外卖食品
that consumers purchase from a restaurant or food stand and eat in another location.


The blast occurred at a fast food stand near the city's old central bus station -   爆炸发生
which was also the target of a bombing in January. 炸弹爆炸

Each food stand has its own recipes for its food;   每个摊位都有它独自的秘方
for example,some like to add sugar or other special ingredients in the food.  有些喜欢加盐或者其他原料

形容麻辣烫
It has been boiled in a pot. 在一个锅里煮熟
It's served on a long stick so you can eat it easily.  食物被穿在一根长的棍子上  吃起来很容易
It comes in various shapes: some are square,others are round,and still others are stick style. 食物形状各异  方形 圆形 长条形
you can buy big or small ones.

They are mixed with sliced vegetables in a pan. 它们和切成片的蔬菜混合在一个锅里
They are about 10 centimeters in length and about 1.5 centimeters in diameter.
spicy hot food.   street food stands are very popular.

Government as well as regional and national authorities are guided on introduction and monitoring of control mechanisms 引入 监督 控制机制
related to safe and hygienic meat production, processing and marketing.  关于 肉制品安全 卫生的 生产 加工 销售

hygienic----卫生的
The matter is urgent: the lack of sanitary installations and hygienic waste removal furthers the spread of disease.
最迫切的问题是：由于缺乏卫生设备和清除卫生垃圾的手段，促使了疾病的扩散

They call to the customers loudly, saying "Come, come, come for fresh fish, fresh and live!"  对着客户大声招呼
They cook the fish right there,   当场烹调鱼 so you watch them cooking it. 看着他们如何做鱼
They ask you what things to put inside the bread with the fish. 询问你 添加什么佐料

During the preparation of your food, you get hungrier and hungrier. 越来越饿  在准备食物的过程中
When, at last, you receive your meal,  当你拿到食物的时候
it smells so nice and I cannot describe the delicious taste. 美妙的口味
Not only do you enjoy the taste of the fish,
but you also smell the fresh air blowing from the Black Sea to the Mediterranean Sea.
Of course,the sea has a very different, fresh air that takes you to other worlds. 与众不同的 新鲜的空气
I mean magic worlds where you can feel like you are on an isolated island like Robinson Crusoe!

Outdoor food stands are very popular in countries everywhere. 户外食品摊位
Often this food is very tasty and you can always see a crowd 一群人around the stands  食物美味 经常一群人围着摊位

public sentiment 公众的情绪；舆情；公众情绪
pedestrian street  步行街
socialize----vi vt, 社交

More than twice as many people go online to socialize (81%) than to do business (39%) or shop (31%).

And even then, one in five says they are so busy that they never have any time to go out and socialize. 没有时间出去社交

Turn off the Internet and go socialize with friends. 关掉网络  去和朋友们参加社交活动

manifold ------adj. 许多的 多样的

chef   大厨 厨师
broadcast---   广播  live broadcast 直播
through distributed computing  通过分布式计算  即云计算

Even so, there are signs of considerable backpedaling in at least near-term commitments to invest in green technology and alternative energy.

While the Chinese government agrees on the need to reduce carbon emissions, 减少碳排放
it prefers to achieve that through increased energy efficiency and by using more alternative energy. 增加能源效率 使用可替代能源

More cost-effective   性价比高
cost effective manner

I see them longing and reaching out for authentic community.

Their love is intense with longing? but they never can fly wing to wing. 比翼双飞
meet regulatory requirements  满足监管需求

An ocean divides us, but we are joined in the basic human longing for freedom, for justice and for dignity.

Although that exposure was small compared with their portfolios, 很小的一部分 相对于他们的投资组合
it could have a big impact because they have so little equity as a cushion.   没有资产作为缓冲

No matter what level of exposure you have, your lung cells know it and they are responding.

So in the NRC world these are the multiple barriers to public exposure and public risk.

Regarding this, the theorists have discussed how to suppress the real estate price through property tax on real estate.
有鉴于此， 压制房价 通过房地产税
The basic problem is that the housing price bubble that inflated over recent decades has popped and continues to deflate.

They batted the shuttlecock back and forth across the net a few time.
来来回回     打羽毛球

badminton racket---羽毛球拍

It is a game for people of all ages and both sexes. 适合所有年龄 不限性别

tile   瓷砖

seasoning ------n.

When we speak of "seasoning, " we're usually talking about salt.

sausage----香肠    sauce   酱汁  酱油 调味品

He collects data about the shopper or steals personal information, such as credit card numbers.

She has a style of her own in everything.  有自己的风格

sedentary-----adj. 久坐的     lifestyle

a mixture of old and modern, east and west

Regardless of ups and downs, we are still together  尽管起起落落，但是仍然在一起

facial expression---面部表情

irritate---- 激怒 惹恼
This might irritate your bladder and aggravate your condition.


Because of its irritating effect on humans, the use of phenol as a general antiseptic has been largely discontinued.


traditional flowery costumes ---

We can't conceive of living without a telephone.  设想 构想

The doctor told her that she couldn't conceive again. 怀孕

All women don't conceive the first time they have sex, as they should have unprotected sex at the right time of the month for pregnancy to occur.

exert----vt. 施加影响


Its best hope is that China can exert influence over Pyongyang to return to the negotiating table. 回到谈判桌

These organisations exert great influence in public life. But we have no means of discovering on whose behalf they do it.

The price of a Toyota is double what it is in the United States. 是美国价钱的两倍

home appliance  家用电器

safety appliance

major appliance

How long can the present business boom last? 持续多久

Architecture is his line.

Today, there are a lot of teenagers who don't know what the traditional culture is. 不知传统文化

It is obvious that many young people have lost their own national identity because of cultural dominance.丧失了民族认同感 由于文化霸权

pervasive-----adj.  普遍的

The fact that so many people have posted comments on this topic shows how pervasive and complicated it is. 关于这个话题发表评论

sunbathing ------日光浴

First of all, if we want to stay competitive, we need to modernize our factory.

competitive advantages  竞争优势

dress code 着装规定

stimulant---n.  兴奋剂 刺激的事情

vitality--vai  体力 活力 热情
a student's life is supposed to be full of energy , vitality and passion, but sometimes it seems to be overstressed .

Children seem to be endued with endless vitality   赋予 无尽的活力

Possession of a firearm is illegal in the park, " the ranger replied.

20-year-old local man

Gymnast Nadia Comaneci was the first gymnast to score a perfect ten in Olympic competition (1976 Montreal Olympic Games).

Well, the campus is really beautiful with a variety of trees and flowers. 各种各样的
Also the professors were friendly and helpful. 友好 帮助人

They often encouraged us to make free discussion in class. 课上自由讨论

investment benchmark 投资基准
benchmark enterprise  标竿企业
===================================================================================
I aspire to become an interpreter in five years. 渴望 翻译
Because English is always my biggest interest besides my daily work.

To be an interpreter, I can interact with different people from different cultures.

Also I can broaden my horizons and enrich my knowledge. 增长见识  丰富知识

I know this is really hard for me,but I will never give up!
==============================================

I am a software engineer.
I work for an American company which name is WR.
My regular office job is from  nine to five.(It is a nine-to-five job).

So, after work,I have some free time to take care of my baby.

============do you like your job?
yes, of course.
I like my job very much.
It offers a variety of benefits,including medical insurance,housing fund,traffic allowance and membership of fitness club.

Also it can give me a sense of achievement especially when we deliver a successful product to customers.


=============do you find your job interesting?
well.
I am afraid not.You know I am a software engineer, so I have to sit in front of my computer all day long.

If I was stuck in difficulties, it would be getting worse and I had to work overtime.

So I have to say my work is not interesting but it is full of challenge.

===========================what are your main responsibilities?  =============

My main work is related to software testing.

But sometimes I also provide technical support for customers if they are not clear about the usage of our products.

======what sorts of things do you do at work?

Before we release a software product to customers, I must do system test, which needs reviewing code,making comments and setting up test environment.

Finally I will give a detailed test report for this new product.
Sometimes, if the customer is not clear about the usage, I also provide technical support through email or telephone.

set expectations for each case and check them regularly.

If the output is not what I want, I should investigate the root reason.

====================Is work important to you?====

Yes, I think so.

I can have a steady income to support my family and pay bills like water,electricity,gas and Internet.

As you may know, most people of my age are under heavy mortgage. So, I have to work every day.

Also,sometimes I can gain satisfaction and achievement in my work,especially after I resolve a tough issue.

======Have you received any training related to your work?

Sure.
When I first came to this company,It gave us  a general technical training about the process of software development and software test.

It was an excellent training and you could gain some new knowledge,which was very useful to my later work.

==============if you could another job, which would you choose?  what was your ideal job?

Well,if I could change my job, I would like to be an English interpreter.

Because English is always my biggest interest besides my daily work.

To be an interpreter, I can interact with different people from different cultures.

Also I can broaden my horizons and enrich my knowledge.

I know this is really hard for me,but I will have a try.

=================================== what job would you like to have in the future?

Well, I wish I could become an English interpreter in 5 years.

English is always my biggest interest besides my daily work. I would like to interact with different people from different cultures.

I think I need more professional trainings to fulfil my dream. There is still a long way to go.

===== how do you usually spend your eveninigs??

I usually get home around 7 PM. Then I will prepare dinner with my wife.I enjoy the process of cooking.

After dinner, I will take care of my baby.It is very fun. Sometimes I can have a big gift if there is an important football game.

==================do you like to go out in the evenings?

Yes, I like to go out in the evenings. Because my home is very close to a beautiful river.Many people are jogging along the river at night.

Also there is the famous square dance,sometimes my wife and my mother will join. But since I had a baby, I rarely went out at night.

You know I have to take care of my little baby.

=============what do people today usually like to do after work?

Many people of my age are pretty tired after work and just want to have some exercise time and quiet rest time to renew their bodies and spirits.(to recharge batteries)

So, they can feel refreshed  and energetic in the next morning.

======== what about you?

I find that I am so tired after a day's work.So I just want to relax. Like watching entertaining TV programmes(BBC documentaries ), listening to light music,reading simple novels.

Also taking care of my baby is a good way to reduce stress.Because baby is my biggest fun.

============ Do you feel lonely if you stay at home for a long time?

I guess I would say no. Sometimes I enjoy being alone at home. I can do anything that I want to do, like watching my favorite NBA games,listening to rock&roll music,

or even practising my singing. Actually you know,this is a connecting society, if you want to interact with outside world, just pick up your mobile phone and make a call,send a message,

or share your videos and photos on your facebook and twitter.



I'm fine?I just need a minute to collect myself.?

?????????????

I also need that time to collect myself and clarify what my purposes are for my next workday.   ??


=====weather   ===================


==== what type of weather do you like best?

I love sunny days with clear blue skies.I like mild temperatures.

=== what type of weather do Chinese people usually like?

I think it varies according to age, where they live,and what they love to do in their spare time.

I find this a hard question to answer since there are so many people in China.

====Which is your least favorite season?

I don't like winter because of the low temperature. You must wear warm and heavy clothes to go out, otherwise, you can just stay at home.

Many trees and flowers seem to be dead without vitality. If there is a heavy snow, the traffic will go into disaster.

Anyway, this season makes me feel depressed.

======what do you often do on sunny days??

Well,My home is very close to a river, so I like to have a jog along the river and,at the same time, I can enjoy the beautiful trees and flowers.

Sometimes I ride my motorbike to work, which you can enjoy the breeze on your face, it is very comfortable.

====And on cold days?



====what is the weather like in your city?

Well, It has four distinct seasons in my city. Spring and Autumn are comfortable and mild. you can do any outdoor activities and enjoy the beautiful nature.

Summer is really hot, while Winter is too cold.You had better do indoor activities in these two seasons.

===wear watch?

=== I prefer to use my cellphone.I think the function of a watch has changed. It was often used to display time in the past,but now, it is mostly for decoration or a symbol of status.

If you work in financial field, you must wear suit and watch,but for me, a software engineer, it is not necessary.

===Do you think it is important to be on time?

Yes, I think it is pretty important to be on time. It is a way to respect others and let them know they are important.

Another example, if you are late for a train or a fligh, the train or flight will never wait for you.

So, remeber, being punctual is good for you.

=====how do you feel when you are late for an appointment?

I feel very sorry and embarrassed. Actually if I was going to be late, I would make a call in advance to explain why. You know sometimes the traffic jam can last several hours.

so if you don't wanto be late, just forget your car and take the subway.

If I was really late, I would buy some small gifts to express my apology.

=====How do you feel when others are late?

When others are late, if they have sound(legitimate) reasons, I can understand. I know sometimes the traffic condition is really bad.

But if they are just getting up late or some personal issue, I  feel  a bit irritated. I think it is not respecting others.

If I am a manager, I will punish him or her to sing a song for us.

=====your hometown

where are you from?

I am from a small village in Qinhuangdao, It is in the northeast of China.

====tell me about your hometown


Well, it is a small village, but I love it.

It has beautiful trees,blooming flowers, and a crystal river around the village.

People here are friendly and they are likely to help others.

Each family has a courtyard to feed chicken,duck,pig and dog.

Compared to big city, it is a paradise for me.






Well, It is a beautiful coastal city.There are lots of famous tourist attractions,like Shan hai guan,Bei Dai he.

You can enjoy the historic culture and attractive landscape.

The people in my city are usually friendly and they are likely to help strangers especially tourists from foreign countries.

=====what is your favorite thing or place in  your hometown?

The favorite thing is go fishing with my friends.

There is a crystal-clear river around my village.

And it has a wide variety of fishes. I usually go fishing in the afternoon.

Fishing is fun and enjoyable.It can makes me feel relaxed.It is a good way to reduce stress.

Also if you are lucky enough to catch big fish, you have a delicious meal at the same time.

=====what would you like to change about your hometown?

If I could change one thing about the town where I grew up,it would be eradicate the poverty.

There are still many families who don't have enough food and can not get medical care and education that they need.

I would love to bring more jobs to local people.

======what attractive pieces of architecture are there in your hometown?

great walls

Well, There is a long walls on the mountains. As far as I know, it was built in Han dynasty which has been more than 2000 years.

Although it is less famous than Shan hai guan great wall, it still attracts many travellers from different areas.


======do you like photography?

Yes. When I graduated in 2008, I bought a digital camera with my first monthsalary.

Taking photos is a good way to relax, also you can remember what you see during your travel.

==== when did you start to like photography?

I began taking pictures when I became a university student in 2001. I remember cleary when I saw my roommates, they took photo albums and showed me where they had been.

It gave me a deep impression, and since then,I have loved taking pictures of nature.

=====how do you feel when others show you their photos?

I really enjoy seeing other people's pictures. It is a good way to relax, also you can see beautiful landscape from different areas.

Usually, there is a small story behind each picture, and I like to listen to the story when browsing through the album.

======when do people often take pictures?

Mostly,I see people taking pictures at memorable events, such as weddings, birthdays,festivals, and something like that. These are important times that

people want to remember.

====Do you keep your old  photos?

sure. I keep most of my old photos. When I go through my pictures one by one, it reminds me of beautiful memories behind each photo.

Maybe one day, I can show my old photos to my daughter and say "look,your father has been to this place when he was young".

====what is a typical Chinese wedding like?

Well,Chinese weddings vary from region to region,but generally there is a banquet with speeches given by friends and family, which includes introductoin of bride and groom.

The bride and groom also bow to the heaven,to parents, and to each other.At the banquet,wonderful Chinese food is served.

The bride and groom also go from table to table and toast their relatives,friends and colleagues. It's really a meaningful time in one's life.

==== transport
===what kind of transport do you usually take?

Well, I often use public transport. Because you know the air quality is really bad.I think I must do something to reduce my carbon footprint.

=====what is the public transport like in your city?

Well, I live in beijing. The public transport is excellent. There are more than 10 lines of subway, you can go anywhere.

Also there are many bus lines.

====what sort of transport would like to use if you were to go on a long trip?

I would prefer to travel by train. firstly it is cheaper than air. I espcially love looking out the window as we pass through the countryside.

Also you can see many people on the train,maybe you can have a enjoyable chat with other people.

====Do you like animals?

sure.I really enjoy playing with animals. Actually I have a dog at my hometown. It is very cute and friendly.Every time when I come back, it is waiting for me at the door.

I can forget my busy work when I see my lovely dog.

===Do any people close to you keep pets?

Yes, our neighour has a small dog. He usually walks his dog in the morning and after dinner.His dog is very cute and friendly to us.

People aroud all love this dog.

====Do you live in a flat or a house?

I live in a flat on the 4th floor of our apartment building. Actually,I would love to live in a house with a yard someday.

But you know the housing price is very high and I can not afford a house.

=====what do you think of the area in which you live?   do you like the surrounding area?

Well, it is very convenient because there are several covenience stores,hospital, and bus stop.
Also it is not very far from the subway station.

But the disadvantage is obvious, it is a little noisy and sometimes I can not sleep well.

====how long have you lived there?

Well, I have lived here for more than 4 years. I like here because of its natural environment.There are enough green space, also a beautiful river right beside my community.

But it is a little far way from my work space.So,I am planing to move to the urban area.

====what are your neighbours like?

Well, actuall I don't even know my neighbours. We hardly ever see our neighbours.everyone is so busy at work.

But this is just opposite in my hometown where we often get together with my neighbours.

=====
on demand    随时随地  按需
City streets around the country have seen an explosion of the colourful bikes
that users can rent on demand with a smartphone app and then park wherever they choose.

Companies such as Ofo and Mobike, with their rival fleets of bumblebee yellow and fluorescent orange bikes, have been locked in a cut-throat battle for customers.

China’s mobile bicycle-sharing platforms have seen their bikes sabotaged in many cities, as their expansion across the country runs into local resistance.

Ofo-brand sharing bicycles in Xiamen, East China’s Fujian Province, a city popular with tourists, have been sabotaged,

with the QR codes used to unlock the bikes being defaced or locals attaching their own locks to the bikes, the local West Strait Morning Post reported on Sunday.

bicycle-sharing

Mobike  Bluegogo  OFO  smart locks     GPS systems           QR code

station-free

security deposit 保证金  押金  misuse 滥用

car damage
traffic violation

"It's really convenient and cheap. You can park the bike almost anywhere.

misplacing bikes  乱放自行车

the unclear management of cash deposits. 押金管理混乱

stroke  中风  游泳姿势
==========the difficult stroke to learn.

swim breaststroke---- 蛙泳  I play badminton at least 2 times a week.

well begun is half done.  好的开始是成功的一半

Nonetheless, I wish to see a ray of hope in this phenomenon.

Pay off your credit cards every month. 按月偿还信用卡

If you need help, get help and get it early -- it will pay off in the long run. 值得的

If you only pay minimum payments, you will be old and gray before you pay off the debt.

and that can be something that you pay off for a long time.

Lots of people pay off their credit cards in full each month to avoid finance charges  避免金融罚款

In order to get out of mortgage, you have to actually pay off the old mortgage  偿还抵押贷款

The bank refused to accept any mortgage on land

toll road, toll station   收费公里  收费站

your efforts will pay off and your life will be better off!  获得回报  生活 更好

We’d be better off without him at the party.  会更好 如果没有他

People then lit their lanterns and set off fireworks and firecrackers.  点着灯笼  燃放烟花爆竹

It’s natural to compare ourselves with others, and many of us tend to compare ourselves with those who are better off.
与别人比较  与生活得更好的人比较
The whole of science is nothing more than the refinement of everyday thinking.

Please forgive my straight-forwardness.  frankness 请原谅我的直接  恕我直言

==============writing ====

sharp,significant,moderate,considerable,enormous   极大的 显著的   中等的 温和的 巨大的

continued on this downward trend until 2004   继续下降趋势

throughout the period.  during the entire period  在这期间  贯穿整个周期

on different dates in Dec.

a steady drop, a slight fall, a gradual decline, a small decrease   稳定下降 轻微的 逐渐的下降 微小的

a rapid leap,a sudden rise,a dramatic rise,a huge growth   快速的上升  突然的 巨大的上涨

no change, a flat trend,  the number remained unchanged  没有变化 平稳的趋势  维持不变

a dramatic drop, a sharp fall,a rapid plunge, a steep decline 巨大的下跌 跳水 垂直下降

a gradual drop,

fluctuate slightly---  轻微波动

rose to  ------------- a rise in

went up to 上升到----------- an increase in

climbed to ------- an upward trend in

fell to ======== a decrease in

declined to ------a decline in

decreased to --------- a fall in

dropped to ======= a drop in

reduced to ====== a reduction in

did not change===     no change in
remained stable at  稳定在

remained steady at

stayed constant at

maintained the same level 保持同等水平

fluctuated around =======   a fluctuation in  在什么左右波动

peaked at ============reached a peak of 达到巅峰

stood at =======

=====pie chart  饼图

between the years 1978 and 2002

staggering-----adj. 令人吃惊的

the bulk of the world's fresh water===

followed by a considerable amount of underground water and a small portion of water which is actually found on the surface.

followed by====紧跟着

The two bar graphs reflect growth rates in urban populations from 5 major cities around the world in 1990 and 2004.

level off  保持平稳  趋向平稳

In men, cholesterol levels generally level off after age 50.

So why do infections 传染病 tend to go up in the cold winter months and level off in the summer?

Our surplus will keep falling in the next few months then level off.

When you first learn to ride your bike you may fall over and over. 一次又一次摔倒

kickback 回扣 佣金

The company manager got a contract to supply computers to the department in exchange for a kickback. 以拿回扣为交换条件

At present, control the medicine kickback is a focus question of correct the bad voguey.

They say local government officials are relying on these funds to provide jobs and economic growth, not to mention kickback opportunities.

endorsement 代言

Do you think celebrity endorsement can help you to understand more the characteristic of product?

rebate-- 退款 退税
You might get a partial rebate. It depends on how much your income exceeds the caps. 超过工资帽

All our employees are forbidden to ask for or accept tips, presents, rebate or entertainment of any kind. 禁止 消费 礼品  回扣 任何形式的娱乐

Mr. Bush previously has said he opposes mandatory carbon caps, saying they would hurt the U. S. economy. 反对 碳排放上限

He said he plans to introduce emissions caps to the U. S. , and reduce greenhouse gas emissions by 80 percent by 2050.
采用碳排放上限
would much rather be  宁愿 更乐意

But they do feel the cold, especially since they would much rather be at home in bed than walking around outside.

I would much rather be a director than an actor.
prohibitive---- 被禁止的  高昂得令人难以承受的；贵得买不起的

Second, the cost of extracting minerals from several kilometres below the surface of the sea was prohibitive.

You can argue that it is possible to copy and paste it out of Netflix, but the cost of doing this is prohibitive for individuals.

On a flagship device, the extra build cost isn't that important, for a mid-priced phone, using a capacitive screen might be prohibitive.
在旗舰产品上    中等价位手机   使用电容屏 太昂贵
underprivileged---- n.  形容词 弱势群体；贫困阶层  处于弱势 贫困的

With the help of friends, he began to distribute candy and small gifts to the underprivileged.

However, per capita income among the most underprivileged is growing between 7 and 8 percent a year, an unprecedented rate.

per-capita income  --n. 人均收入

has deep pockets  财大气粗 口袋有钱  财力雄厚
Although the nation as a whole has deep pockets and is able to handle huge projects, the per-capita income is still very low.
虽然口袋有钱 财大气粗 进行巨大的工程
Yet most individual Chinese have never been rich: per-capita income has always been lower than the world average.

livelihood---- 赚钱谋生的手段 生计

cutting-edge science  尖端科技

a cost-effective, eco-friendly way to purify water. 性价比高的 环保的 净化水

dry up----  河水干涸

This causes groundwater levels 地下水位下降 to decline and rivers to dry up

 environmentalist---- 环保主义者
 Maathai established the Green Belt Movement and encouraged the women of Kenya to work together to grow seedings and plant trees to bind the soil, store rainwater,
 provide food and firewood. Through her efforts, over 51 million trees have been planted in Kenya.
 Although Maathai died in 2011, her daughter Wanjira continues her work improving the livelihoods of the women of Kenya and striving for a “cleaner, greener world.”

 transformational

 What's your favourite food?
 ----seafood, because it is delicious  and rich in protein, also eating seafood is good for controlling high blood pressure 控制高血压

 What was your favourite food as a child?-- was dumplings, it is typical Chinese food and very delicious.  It is very popular in China.

 Do you like to try new food?---Yes, I like to try new food if there is an opportunity. But I must make sure it is safe, clean and healthy.  You know the food safety is the first priority

 Have you ever tried any foreign food?

 at odds over ----  差异 存在分歧
 Democrats and Republicans are still at odds over how much spending should be cut to fund the government for the next six months.
 Doctors are at odds over how much sun their patients should get.
医生们一直都在争论究竟他们的病人应该接受多少阳光才合适。

tailspin---- 尾旋
I'd give everything to make it good again, I'd do anything to get out of this tailspin .

 hike

He said the government will look at a range of options, including a hike in electricity charges and longer holidays.

give-and-take----

We can only settle this argument if there is a bit of give-and-take on both sides.

the rally in the stock market  油价回升                between risk and safety

tailwind---顺风
That suggests the recent rally in oil prices may have a strong tailwind from the world's central banks.

We have a nice tailwind going into the third quarter, ' he said in an interview. 顺利进入第三季度

they say

headwind  逆风  outperform   跑赢大盘；跑赢大市；表现超越大市
A further headwind for small cap investors散户投资者: The stocks have already outperformed for a decade.
 The cycle may be due to turn. 周期要反转

One clear policy headwind is the unknown degree to which interest rates will rise.

Take her to your home and tell her something should be paid attention to in your home.

equity--- 资产  股本  private equity  私募  slide 降低
All this at a time when companies acquired by private equity last time round are sliding into default in record numbers.


To challenge the implications of my own findings, I often play devil’s advocate 魔鬼式辩论

lead to a price spike   价格高峰；秒杀价 价格上涨

to eliminate waivers  消除豁免权

it won’t renew waivers that let countries buy Iranian oil without facing U.S. sanctions 美国制裁
will travel to Beijing next week to discuss “trade issues including

intellectual property, forced technology transfer, non-tariff barriers, agriculture, services, purchases and enforcement
知识产权                强迫技术转让                  非关税壁垒
But without a reliable currency benchmark, it is hard to set accurate prices or to value assets.
货币基准                                                  定价 或者 评估资产
While the U.S. and China are inching close to a deal  接近达成协议
for next round of discussions starting May 8
drew an analogy

https://helpsavenature.com/benefits-of-recycling -----------reading   non-biodegradable 不能生物降解的

if you recycle 1 ton of plastic, it saves up to 5,774 kilowatt-hours of energy

Plastic is manufactured from derivatives of crude oil  原油的衍生物
A Stanford Recycling Center study states that recycling 1 ton of plastic bottles saves 16.3 barrels of oil.

provide some kind of pressure outlet.   压力释放途径

backfire
Unfortunately, this is not always the case; Amanda's story is just one of many examples of how having a higher paycheck can backfire.


retaliation  报复
S. hopes in that way either to drive Iran to its knees or to provoke an attack by Iran that would justify massive retaliation.

For instance, china has been trying to open up the south American markets, they met with strong anti-dumping retaliation. 反倾销报复

"If you know what to say and how to say it, you can speak up and keep the risk of retaliation to a minimum, " he said.  保持在最低限度

This in turn could trigger anti-American feelings in Turkey strong enough to leave Ankara feeling that it has no choice but to retaliate.
反过来             触发       反美情绪

On the eve of a special EU summit on Georgia, he warned that Russia was ready to retaliate against any sanctions the EU might impose.
在EU峰会前夕                                                             准备好反制 报复  制裁  施加的制裁
It's 5G that embodies most of Washington’s fears -- embody  体现 具体化
by powering a wealth of upcoming technologies from self-driving cars to advanced medical procedures, 无人驾驶汽车到 先进的医疗
the new wireless standard is set to be the backbone of the modern economy. 无线标准
Until recently, it seemed like Huawei,
the world's biggest purveyor of communications networking gear and the second-largest smartphone maker,
was leading in supplying that infrastructure

relocate 搬家                                         上班方便      或者接受新的工作
You might have to relocate to make it more convenient to get to your job, or to accept a new job offer.
They had an on-again, off-again correspondence for a few months.
他们断断续续地联络了几个月。
was on-again, off-again hours at a factory, unloading trucks and constructing toy rockets on an assembly line
                                            卸载货物 从卡车上      制造玩具火箭                装配线 流水线
squat toilets-----
Jeremy, how important is the gym for you, i would like to know how much do you squat and bench?

Some toilets here are holes in the ground you squat over
Unable to support himself, he moved in with his parents in Lancaster and worked as a pizza deliveryman 送披萨的快递员

You order takeout and the deliveryman leaves you with a white plastic bag .
订购外卖                    快递员                      留下白色塑料袋

Though he earned just around $1,000 a month in China,
the school where he was teaching covered most of his rent  承担了大部分房租
and the cost of living was much lower than in Pennsylvania  生活成本远低于
monthly loan bill of $700
I had to take whatever I could so I could pay on the loans

the technical ladder.   技术阶梯
Entry level engineers can make over $150,000 from Google or Facebook, according to some estimates.
入门级工程师                                                                 根据一些推测
It is your level that decides how much you make. 级别决定了能赚多少

entry-level engineers start at Level 3

Therefore, it should not be surprising to see the index churn around current level for a couple of days before heading lower again.

make six figures  赚到6位数

up-or-out culture 不晋升就走人的文化
And engineering is an "up or out" profession: you either move up the ladder or face unemployment.
做技术是一种“晋升否则出局”的职业：你要么往更高的职位上爬，要么面临失
It’s kind of pyramid shaped that the higher you get up that ladder, the fewer people there are at that level
有点 类似金字塔        爬得越高      那个层级的人越少 朋友越少
Financial technology is comprised of several concepts and tools: 金融科技 由 什么组成
blockchain, cryptocurrency, big data, and the Internet of Things (IoT) are terms that come to mind
区块链    加密货币        物联网
Take any job you can just to get into the momentum of having a calendar,” Lemonis says,
“a schedule of getting up on Monday morning and finishing on Friday night

Do your own damn laundry, and cook your own food, and get your own job. Pay your own bills 自己付账单

gig ---- 临时工作   take any gig
If you can’t find a paid internship or job in the field you’re interested in, take any gig you can land, even if it pays only $12 per hour, the multi-millionaire says.

“It’s better than you sitting at home making zero dollars

I've been a stay-at-home mom for the past five years, and I'm ready to go back to work.

When the summer heat waves strike, I bet you would rather stay at home all day under the air-conditioning than go out in the heat.
夏天热浪来袭                         打赌   宁愿呆在空调屋
the relationship between working hours and life satisfaction

if you go all work and no play it’s not going to benefit you either  只工作 不享受  对自己没有益处
It’s hard to get a feeling of productivity without work, but similarly if you go all work and no play it’s not going to benefit you either.”
Factors such as debt, unemployment and problems with (welfare assistance) can be associated with poor mental health,” she said.
债务   失业   糟糕的精神状态
“The type of work is also important ? it needs to be suited to someone’s individual needs, skills and aspirations
                                                  适合 适应               个人需求 技能 抱负
He typically works six days a week, Monday through Saturday, for nine to 11 hours a day.
And, as I saw when I spent a day shadowing him, he rarely takes breaks. 很少休息
After all, the more rides he completes, the more he gets paid, so “you want to be busy all the time,” he told me. “Our time is money.”
开得越多 指司机
https://www.cnbc.com/2019/02/04/how-much-money-nyc-uber-lyft-and-juno-drivers-can-earn-in-a-day.html

Surge pricing, or “prime time,” tends to happen during rush hour, bad weather or if there’s a big event going on in the area.
高峰价    黄金时段                                                                         大事发生
But clearly one has to expect that frictions will continue,   摩擦 继续
and business will have to diversify supply chains   使供应链 多元化
and will have to rethink how to really spread their portfolio across the world 扩展投资
in order to be less vulnerable 不脆弱
building self-reliance
Huge amounts of capital and talent are going to be thrown at building self-reliance 大量资金和人才 涌向 投入 建立自力更生
and establishing a kind of parallel ecosystem here without dependence on U.S. chips, operating systems
生态系统                  不依靠美国的芯片和操作系统
to counter those losses.  抵消那些损失
restart/resume trade talks      重启 贸易对话
Trump decided to postpone tariffs on an additional $300 billion annually in Chinese imports, while China agreed to buy more U.S. agricultural products
推迟灌水
The trade tensions rippled through the technology sector and have pushed China to develop its own semiconductor industry  发展半导体产业

grounded  停飞 触底
Once the fleet is grounded, America will for a while have no means of its own to deliver men and women to any part of space.

I found it hard, it was hard to find, oh well, whatever, never mind.

You are driving on the wrong side. 逆向行驶

drive backward       go forward
Likewise, if the woman must lift, it is safest for her to lift cross-court so that all she has to do is take a step backward to defend.

notify somebody of sth  通知某人
I should be very grateful if you could notify me of your decisions at your earliest convenience. 当你方便的时候

The minister admitted that he gave preferential treatment to people from his own party.
部长                          给予优先照顾 优先权

consensual ---- 双方一致同意的
o, it's got to be consensual, even though at the end of the day you have to make the final decision.

I am prepared to take some concession on minor details, but I cannot compromise on fundamentals.
                 做出让步                                             妥协 折中   在根本问题上

a conflict of interest   利益冲突

But meanwhile you should not allow anyone else to know about this transaction as my late father did not disclose to anyone.

obligation   职责 责任

Gifts can create an expectation that something will be provided in return     作为回报
put personal interests in conflict with professional obligations

misrepresent

Don't say anything that would misrepresent your message if it was taken out of context.


Too many things changed on the rules, on the technical side, political side.

wear and tear   折旧 磨损

Conclusion: The set 设备 has been used for a very long time without any proper maintenance, which has resulted in 导致a lot of wear and tear很大磨损.

Even if careful and well intentioned, use of equipment and other company resources can result in wear-and-tear.
There is also a risk of loss or damage and the potential for liability issues.
丢失 损坏
How exactly to do this is, of course, the subject of highly controversial and politically charged debates these days.

distasteful 难吃的食物

You know, distasteful food, plainly-looking staff, noisy environment, overheated or overcooled rooms, all this will drive customers away. 赶走游客

In today’s connected, digital world, 互联互通 数字世界
it is almost impossible to truly separate our work and personal lives,  使工作和个人生活分开
particularly on social media.
While employees are afforded some protection and privacy to discuss work conditions on social media, 提供保护 隐私  在社交媒体上讨论工作
otherwise disparaging, offensive, illegal, or harassing comments and behavior can lead to adverse employment consequences.
It’s important to know and follow the company’s social media policies  了解 遵守 公司社交媒体准则
and be mindful of how your online behavior reflects on you and your employer.

disparage   [ri]  贬低 轻蔑

Now I do not for a moment mean to disparage business. My whole point is that it was not for me.

shared values   共同的价值观

"If you know what to say and how to say it, you can speak up and keep the risk of retaliation to a minimum, " he said.

For instance, china has been trying to open up the south American markets, they met with strong anti-dumping retaliation.

Ethics is about doing the “right” thing.   道德标准关于做正确的事情
An ethical community is one in which individual actions are aligned with shared values and standards of conduct

The system is cost-effective and can improve the public transport operator's service quality, with a certain degree of market applications.
系统 性价比高                          改善公共交通运营服务
===============
The best kind of education

“There is much debate 争论 as to the best kind of education for students today.
Some think private schools are tops顶尖的. A lot of money goes into these schools and the programs are usually of a high quality,
yet the tuition fees are often more than the average person can afford.  普通人承受不了学费
Others think that given a good administration and teachers who care, public schools can offer good educations as well.
One problem is that classes in public schools tend to have many more students than private schools,  学生多 在公立学校
and therefore individual attention can sometimes suffer.  不可能照顾到每个人
Generally, however, quality is based on the individual schools and student interests  质量 建立在 学校  学生兴趣
rather than whether the schools are publicly or privately funded.”  公立  私立


T-junction   T型路口
This was a small crossroad without any traffic lights or policemen. I pushed my bike and wanted to go across the road. 推着自行车

Many investors have already contacted the team trying to put the invention into commercial production. But the team refused. 发明投入到商业生产

It was the breakthrough in the Japanese auto industry that helped the company expand into the arena of passenger car production. 乘用车生产

tailor   tailored to future employability     裁剪调整 以适应将来的就业
Britain, at least, was able to tailor its interest rates to local conditions, but not by enough to prevent a housing bubble.

employability
be rated among top 10
Furthermore, the University has been rated among the top 10 跻身前十位UK universities for graduate employability. 毕业生就业


logistics   outsource
Considering the realities in China and thee-retail's development situation, logistics outsourcing is often the best choice.

It has been a basic law that the highly developed and mature logistics and commerce show the modernization of a city.

outsource  动词  业务外包

"It would be hard to outsource my job because there is so much specialist knowledge and business jargon involved, " he says.

broad-based  有广泛基础的 大范围的

In his weekly radio address, the president says broad-based tax relief should be big enough to make a difference.

'That's what drives innovation, benefits consumers, and ultimately stimulates broad-based and sustainable growth, ' she said.
推动革新      有利于消费者                                 最终促进大范围的 持续的增长
enter  dreamland  进入梦乡
dreamland

place great emphasis on sth

But anyway, to get back to the point, you and Miss Lamont do achieve a certain intimacy in all your pictures.

he didn't realize that true intimacy 亲密关系 can only come if we accept our loved ones just as they are, 接受爱人的一切
rather than trying to change them.  而不是尝试改变他们

make it a top priority  最高优先级
The contemporary society 当代社会

drift off 不知不觉入睡

Just as you drift off is when you're most likely to have that brilliant idea.

This is both a mental exercise and a body relaxing exercise, so hopefully you're ready to drift off at the end of it.
精神和身体上的放松练习
We often forget how much kids take parental criticisms to heart and how much these affect their feelings about themselves.
孩子们会多在乎家长的责备                                          影响对自己的感觉
grounding  基础

provide a generic grounding in all areas of knowledge

Write an outline in note form.

plastic film coating  塑料薄膜外衣 包装

List of Materials That Are Recyclable  可回收的

firstly we should know what materials are recyclable.

Newspapers, office paper, magazines and cardboard,  纸板
You can even recycle gift wrapping paper  礼品包装袋
if it doesn't have a plastic film coating on the top

Paper recycling may be one of the easiest and most common forms of recycling
回收纸制品                        最容易  最常见
There are two major categories of metal recycling: aluminum and steel.  铝和铁
For aluminum, think soda cans.
Steel cans often store soups, sauces, beans or fruit. 存储汤 调料 豆 水果
The lids of these cans are also recyclable.  瓶盖 lid
If you aren't sure how to tell them apart,  如何区分
remember this: Steel cans are magnetic, aluminum cans are not.
铁罐有磁性
resin   树脂  合成树脂
spinach  菠菜
Plastics are often the most confusing type of recyclable material. 可回收材料
What do those numbers on the bottom of the container mean, anyway? Let's break it down. 分解一下  解析一下

The important take-away is that not all plastics are recyclable materials.
The symbols on the bottom of plastic containers tell us what type of plastic resin 塑料树脂 makes up the container. 组成 制作这些容器
The most commonly seen and recyclable plastics are #1 (PET: clear plastics, like water and soda bottles),
#2 (HDPE: usually more opaque plastics, like laundry soap and milk jugs),
and #5 (yogurt, butter, sour cream containers). 酸奶  黄油 奶酪容器


we can also say that zoos,(unlike big shopping malls that can make large amounts of cash flow all the time),are burning money every day.
But can you imagine a city without a zoo?

add to
Or you may spend hours poring over the details and trying to figure out what kind of tests you need to add to your test harness.

facility
The company by year-end will announce where in the U. S. it will build a solar plant and a software facility.

As technology has been developing rapidly,artificial meat becomes available,which makes the excuse sound more insensible.
                                          人造肉
Therefore,to some extent,killing animals is equal to digging our own graves.
                                         等同于 无异于  自掘坟墓
There is no doubt that our lives would be far less convenient without a little help from our animal friends.
毫无疑问                                 很不方便    没有动物朋友的帮助
in a spiritual way. 精神的 心灵的
There is nothing better than keeping a dog or a cat if you want your kids to be more independent and responsible
没有什么比这个更好             养猫养狗                                            小孩更加独立和负责
It is almost noted that senior citizens will live longer if they keep pets after their retirement.
                       老人                  长寿                 养宠物     退休后
Those who regard animals as merely a source of food and clothing should at least bear one thing in mind----being kind to animals is being kind to ourselves.
          认为动物   只是提供食物和衣服原料                                          牢记一件事
Therefore,for our own future benefit,please treat animals with love and care.
为了未来的利益                         善待关爱动物
treat animals as living meat and walking fur.

China is embarrassed by such a fact: Chinese visitors are dropping garbage on the Wall, followed by a foreigner picking up the litter.
                                                          丢垃圾            在长城                                捡垃圾
liken          liken to        liken with
把 什么比作 比喻成
a tiger is one of the most powerful animals in the wild.
are we praising a person or not when we liken him to a tiger? that depends.
                                        把他比作老虎
in all weathers    风雨无阻
in all kinds of weather, good and bad
However, I really fear to meet bad weather. If it rains, the only thing I can do is staying at home to watch TV and play computer.
                 很害怕      遇到坏天气

joneses
Edward is always trying to keep up with the Joneses.
爱德华老是不断地和邻居比较。
Keep up with the Joneses  （与朋友和邻居在物质和社会成就方面）攀比，比富有，比排场，比阔气
compare unrealistically
Comparison; Keeping up with the Joneses(nziz); Comparisons
oh, please. Stop trying to keep up with the Joneses. You know you can't afford it.

Protecting historic blocks means protecting the memory for history, the features and the culture of the city and tourist resource.
保护             历史建筑                    保护历史记忆               特性和文化     城市和旅游资源
expedient  权宜之计；应急办法   形容词 权宜的 方便的

among the few 为数不多的 仅有的几个
In the present global economic downturn, China is among the few countries that have the economic muscle to pull the world out of it.
               全球    经济下滑                                                           经济实力
We can't avoid the process, but we could learn to be more critical and as selective as possible
         不能避免                         学会        更加批评 有选择性
It's never too late to study something, smile to the life, work hard and work smiled.
学东西什么时候都不晚                       微笑面对生活        努力工作 微笑工作
corrupt   腐败 贪污的 受贿 动词 形容词
Those corrupt officials went from the desire to gain petty advantages to what can only be described as greed.
贪污的官员们              从小的利益                                     到 贪婪
For example, a U.S. company spent $7 million transporting 运送Chinese government officials to popular tourist destinations 著名旅游景点
in the United States such as Las Vegas, the Grand Canyon, Niagara Falls, and Disney World.
In the books记录 记载, many of these expenses were falsely recorded as travel to “training sessions” or “factory inspections.” 培训可 工厂考察

contravene    违反 抵触 违背

Women are able to retain all property they owned prior to marriage in the case of divorce.
                  保留婚前财产                     在结婚前                  在离婚案
However, this provision does not apply to men.  条款  不适用于男方

token

by the same token
for the same reasons
Reasonable gifts to foreign officials as tokens of esteem or gratitude would not contravene the FCPA provision.
However, these gifts must be made openly and transparently, and recorded in the company’s books.
Also, such tokens should be given only where appropriate under local laws and customs.

How much is the airfare from New York to Los Angeles?
                机票

to curry favor with     try to curry favor with sb  讨好 奉承 拍马屁
seems designed to curry favor with the foreign government officials to garner future contracts

The Act prohibits use of charitable contributions to funnel bribes to government officials
        禁止              慈善捐赠                     输送贿赂 给政府官员
pharmaceutical   制药的

on no condition 绝不  在任何情况下都不会

affiliate   分支机构；分公司

discretion   谨慎；慎重；审慎；自行决定的自由
I told him I wanted discretion, that I didn't want to do anything risky, and that it would be a one-time thing.
                                                        不想冒险                               一次性的事情
Three months later, the agent informs the company that he has run into problems obtaining a necessary environmental permit
because the planned road would impact an environmentally sensitive wetland.
Rerouting the road would cost millions and delay construction by six months.
The agent offers an alternative. He is a friend of the Director of the foreign country’s Department of Natural Resources.
He suggests a modest cash payment to the Director would “make the problem go away.”
Management authorizes the payment, the agent makes it, the permit is issued,
and the mining company constructs its new road through the wetlands.

expedite 加快；加速  形容词 加快的

We need those items urgently. I thought if I met with you face-to-face, it would expedite the process.
                                                 面对面见面                        加快流程
sticky note   便利贴

Violations of the FCPA may result in significant fines or imprisonment.
                           导致       大额罚款      坐牢
carton  硬纸盒

PDCA:  Plan do check action

3C     Computer ,Communication , Consumer electronic

5W1H?When , Where , Who , What , Why , How
5M: Man , Machine , Material , Method , Measurement

male die    阳模；凸模
female die

easily damaged parts   易损部件
standard parts   标准部件
barcode scanner   条码扫描仪
screw 螺丝  动词 拧紧
      automatic screwdriver 自动螺丝刀  改锥

front office 前台部

We offer 10% discount for group reservation, sir.
提供 10%折扣                团体预定

check-in   登记住宿
check out  结账离开
-------------2019.11.6  IELTS writing--     xiaozhan Li, score 7
whether child should use cell phone, some advocate and some oppose. discuss both and give your opinion.

Nowadays,cell phone is commonly used in people's daily lives.
It seems that people even can not live without cell phones.
Some people hold the view that children should also have their own cell phones.Others,however,
take the opposite point. This essay will examine this issue and come to a conclusion.

Admittedly,smartphones can bring a great number of benefits to people,including children.
They can communicate effectively and efficiently with their parents,friends and teachers.
This is particularly necessary when considering into the fact that now teachers tend to assign tasks to students through some Apps,
such as WeChat or Skype. If children do not have smartphones, no wonder they may not receive the assignments in time and could affect their study.
In addition,the functionalities of cell phone are not limited to making calls,sending text messages or listening to music.
They often support the new feature of locating,which is very helpful to children's safety.For example,if a child is lost,
his or her parents,police officers and teachers are able to quickly pinpoint where the child is and can rush to the place.

Clearly smartphones can bring many conveniences to children's lives and study,but it is important to figure out the demerits of using cell phones.
To begin with,children can easily use smartphones to access to the Internet which is awash with violent,bloody and obscene videos and images.
Children are too immature to distinguish right from wrong,so they are more likely to copy what they see on the cell phones,which may lead them to go astray.
In addition,some children often spend too much time playing mobile games with their smartphones,which can easily cause eyestrain and headache and do harm to
their physical development.What is worse,according to the latest statistics,children's free time has been occupied mostly by smartphones
and this will inevitably affect the family bonds,because they are more likely to communicate with family members through cell phones
rather than face-to-face communication.

To sum up,from what has been discussed above,we can safely draw a conclusion that cell phone is really helpful to children,but we still can not
overlook the disadvantages it would bring.As a result,my opinion is that children can surely use smartphones while at the same time parents and teachers must
give strict control and proper instructions to guide them to use cell phones in the right way.

===========================you, as a tenant,write a letter to the landlord about the water issue.==== xiaozhan Li
Dear Jack,

I am writing this letter to inform you of the water issue in your apartment.

I have been living here for more than one month and everything is perfect.But something unexpected had happened since last Friday morning.
I switched on the faucet just as usual and wanted to wash my socks.To my surprise,the color of the water was yellow and it was smelly.
I was a bit scared.I thought there might be something wrong with the water system and it would be okay later.So I went to work and ignored it.
When I returned home from work,I found the water quality still did not come back to normal.

I quickly confirmed with my neighbors and they said their water system were normal.I also made a call to the water company and they replied that there was nothing
wrong with the water source.So, I had to check the water facility in your kitchen and finally found an sophisticated water purified system just beside the water source.
Maybe there was something wrong with the water purifier and it spoiled the water.

As you may know,I have to make meals and wash clothes every day,which both need a lot of water.But now I have to buy mineral water and what is worse,
I have not washed my dirty clothes for nearly three days.This water issue really causes too much trouble to my life.Based on our contract,the landlord should have the
liability to repair it.

So, would you please come over to check the water system as soon as possible?
My wife and I will be really appreciated for your help and kindness.
If you can come,please tell me the specific time and I will wait for you at home.

I really look forward to hearing from you soon.

Yours sincerely,
Sam
---------------------------------------------------------------------------

While Mr. Hanson said he expected occupancy levels to increase 1 or 2 percent next year, he did not see rates rebounding soon.

penalise   惩罚；处罚

Some politicians and activists believe attitudes could be changed by tax laws that penalise investors who trade in and out of stocks.
政客 积极人士                                                                                  投资者 买卖股票

on your own  独自的 独立的
a reality check   面对现实
It allows you to run automated building and testing of your applications in the cloud rather than on your own computer.
运行自动化构建编译                    测试               应用               在云端                    在个人电脑
If your parents have been covering your living expenses at college, you probably need a reality check before stepping out on your own.
                一直承担 负责 大学生活费                                    面对现实
Use it or lose it     越用越熟练 不用就会丢失  多指技能 例如英语能力
slow somebody down------  减缓 降速
by the stage a student gets to high school 到什么阶段  上高中
The more you use it,the easier it will be to recall next time you wish to use it
用得越多             越容易想起来                      下次你想用的时候
But actually, some scholars have opposing views and believe that it is only statistical data and should only be used for reference.
                   学者          持有反对观点                            仅仅使统计数据                        只能作为参考

double-check   come across,run into,encounter,bump into

It is worth remembering that
forget about it 算了吧  忘掉它
in order of time,place,name
how they are constructed   如何构造 建造
There is a probability that   有种可能性
follow the steps outlined below,  按照如下步骤
if you are not in a mad rush  如果不着急
incorporate  include   contain

it will direct you to the right direction  引导去正确的方向

Chinese medical practitioner  中医从业者

practitioner

A: Hi. What’s up?

B: Nothing much. What’s new with you?

A: Not too much. I’ve been pretty busy.

B: Me too. Seems like all I do is eat and sleep.  似乎我做的 只有吃 睡

A: Gotta go. Call me tonight.  该走了

B: Okay. Check you later.


1) pretty (adj): rather ??

2) gotta:= I’ve got to

3) Check you later. = I’ll call you later.

There are six personnel in this office.  6个员工

The front-desk personnel asks the guest for a driver's license and form of payment.
前台员工                                                           付款形式
field
To create the datastore you only have to create a model for it: a JSON file that defines the fields and options for those fields.

live up to your expectations   符合预期  达到预期

The resulting situation meant that the "Museum of Oriental Ceramics" was not able to live up to its name.
由此产生的情况
go all out to do sth,  go all out on sth  全力以赴

If you want to go all out on your website, you can put together shopping cart technology, but that be pricey to start out with.
I went all out this year.

rain on your parade   泼冷水
Sorry to rain on your parade, but he cancelled the show.

beg to differ

Don't sweat it   不用担心

come down to   归结为 归根结底

Ultimately, it's going to come down to what's best for you and best for your situation.


come down with   生病 得病  染上 患

Most of us come down with at least a couple of colds a year; children get up to a dozen.
                          至少几次感冒
Some 400 students at a university have come down with a mystery fever and the cause was under investigation .


 The guests are all downstairs.   在楼下

 she began to run downstairs  跑到楼下

oppressive     闷热的  压抑的
I feel as if I had fire and ice within me, and the air is so oppressive.
                   体内冰火交织                  空气很压抑
steal my thunder  抢风头；抢了我的风头
It was sweet at first, but now I think he's trying to steal my thunder.

a pain in the neck    讨厌的家伙；使人讨厌的事
To be honest, it was horrible! My manager is such a pain in the neck!
Oh, sorry to hear that. Physics is always a pain in the neck. 物理

The traffic is such a pain in the neck. It's always bad at Friday night. 交通让人讨厌
Standing on the bus is such a pain in the neck.

How'd it do?   ====how did it go?  情况怎样

turn in 上交
Of course, the assignment solution that you turn in should reflect your own understanding, and not that of your fellow students.
                                                           反应你的理解
the combined effect is as if

Turning down the thermostat in winter (and up in summer) a little helps too: Experts say each degree can trim 2%-3% from your heating bill.


cumbersome
to streamline cumbersome workflow, improving speed producing live.
简化
For direct response campaigns, the information-gathering process is often too cumbersome for mobile devices.

stampede
This led to a stampede of people who wanted this.
Silicon Valley's annual coming-out season for tech start-ups is about to turn into a stampede.
                                              技术初创公司
At least 147 people were killed in India in a stampede at a Hindu temple in Jodhpur in the north-western state of Rajasthan.


pay the mortgage,   偿还贷款
put the lid on it.
mortgages basically hardly ever default.????????????
There is no possible chance you are ever going to lose your money.

fill up the tank   汽车加油
blow the horn    按喇叭
turn the wheel left   左转弯
Every week, one of the new generation of internet firms seems to attract a sky-high valuation.
                                         互联网公司                吸引 极高的估值
financial institutions, rating institutions, rate triple A.
He said his evaluation of the data indicates that many Internet companies merit their sky-high valuations.
            评估数据                表面                 互联网公司         值得         高估值
large losses.  municipal bonds.
There are hedge funds that own those on high leverage.
对冲基金                              高杠杆

A hedge against conflict, in the form of cash, short-term bonds and gold, should be part of any portfolio.

portfolio
In today's environment, they are just a little more willing to take the risk out of their portfolio by cashing out.

security

sell those securities.
Many have been forced to sell shares to meet margin calls on tens of billions of dollars in loans.

which made them  worth even less and got the bank ever more nervous.
That resulted in higher-rated securities being sold.

I am broke this week.

keep me on my toes    ---keep her on her toes
一刻也闲不着，乐此不疲；让我保持警觉的方法
h, oh, oh, oh, you know the way to keep me on my toes.
He gave me a couple of extra things to do just to keep me on my toes.
他又给了我一些额外的事做，只是不想让我闲下来。

keep it down  降低 减小

But I'm just wondering if you could keep it down a bit, because the noise is really getting on my nerve.
                                    降低音量                                         使人烦躁 发疯
real estate  房地产
The government is trying to impose new real-estate taxes, create a better social-safety net and encourage better worker pay, he said.
                            施加新的房地产税

Builders and real estate agents   建筑商   房产代理

mortgage    抵押贷款          principal
panic selling of securities  恐慌性卖出债券
as people desperately tried to get out of stuff before it would become worth less.
rapid de-leveraging  快速去杠杆
de-leverage   去杠杆
lend you money to keep liquid  借钱保持流动性
go into a recession    进入经济衰退

It also presents the effects, advantages and disadvantages of every method, and offers a prospect for the technique application.
this is a problem that is a pervasive one.

pervasive   普遍的

the largest debtor nation, the largest creditor.
最大债务国                   最大债权国
resilient  有弹性的  形容经济

siphon off   虹吸效应  可以形容 贪官
They charge criminals and corrupt officials have been working together to siphon off wealth while terrorists are sabotaging reconstruction.
     指控    犯罪分子      腐败官员                                          吸取民脂民膏                            破坏建设
She said dishonest officials siphon off teachers' salaries and even leave students without chalk.
她说，贪官污吏克扣教师的工资，甚至让学生们连粉笔也用不上。

We ended up making twenty-four times our money in that deal

volatility

by the time I got back to my office   当我回到办公室

It became pretty clear that I was doing the wrong thing for a living.

I decided very quickly this was a  bad business.

private equity  私募

you have 3-1 leverage,  you are leveraged three-to-one.
you will get a much better return than any normal stock market. 获取更好的汇报 投资收益    普通股票市场
That's sort of the model of what we do in that business.
I earned 10% last year in the stock market.
what happened was that in the late 1990s

you need to put up 20% of the cost of the house

credit
However, as in the case of a falling tide, Beijing has been tightening credit to fight inflation for a year now.
                         退潮的时候                           收紧信贷              应对通胀

dry academic course     枯燥的学术课程

ubiquitous    --- universal  pervasive  通用的 普遍的

in the developed world at least, electricity is now so ubiquitous that most people notice it only when it fails to work.
                                 电力                如此普及                        注意到它                不工作
The growing emphasis on battery life is one reason why fast chargers are so ubiquitous.
    越来越关注和强调电池寿命                    一个原因     快速充电器         变得如此普及
common practice     常规  惯例  常见的做法

high-end   高端的 形容科技

readily available  现成的 方便的

wear and tear   折旧 磨损 形容设备

Conclusion: The set has been used for a very long time without any proper maintenance,
which has resulted in a lot of wear and tear.

over time
average out the cost   把平均价拉低
If you think a stock is good, you can pick it up in small amounts    小批量买入
so that you average out the cost of the investment over time.
如果你认为一只股具投资潜能，可考虑分几次买入以把平均价拉低。

charge
For instance, Samsung promises its 45-watt charger can go from zero to a 70% charge in half an hour.
            承诺                    45瓦充电器           从0到70% 在半小时内
Apple says the fast charger that comes with its iPhone 11 Pro can hit a 50% charge in 30 minutes.
快充                             充电 come with                    到达 50%电荷 电量
drain    消耗    下水管 排水沟
It's incredibly addictive, and you'll notice your phone battery quickly drain as you spend hours trying to conquer each level.
非常  上瘾

let your phone discharge all the way down once in a while
放电
the device could default to the lowest possible charging speed
默认   充电速度
contraction    收缩 锁紧

Here's what happened: the Fed decided to squeeze inflation out of the system through a monetary contraction.


https://www.msn.com/en-us/news/technology/six-truths-about-your-phones-battery-life-overcharging-overheating-and-fast-charging/ar-BBYxSVW

Battery life has become a primary concern for phone owners.
the importance of all-day battery life on a single charge
refilling the battery fast
Now that fast charging is so readily available for phones, we have questions:
What does a high-capacity charger do to a phone's battery
and is there a chance that rapid charging can degrade your phone's power-storing capability over time?
most personal electronics and electric vehicles -- use lithium-ion (li-ion) rechargeable batteries

humble abode
When they came to my humble abode once again, my affection towards them did not change.

 cloud-native, data-driven, AI-infused

sentimental

However, no gold is pure and no one is perfect, but conscience is always ready to help officials to improve and perfect their work.

Christy Brown--inspiring movie

boarding pass  登机牌



It is so hot in here/there.

In a instant. John is a friend of
I'm an actor----I'ma  nactor

call up---ca llup
build up--- buil dup
where is --- whe reis
what if---- wha dif
hold on a minute--- holdon a minute
give me a cup of coffee--- give me acupof coffee
just a moment--- justa moment
for a while-- fo ra while
work out--- wor kout
Can I think it over?


Bill likes swimming--- billikes wming

stop practising
next time-- nextime
I wish she would call me.   ----I wishshe would call me
I had a bad day----badday
nine nails--- ninenails
His name is Bob Barker. ---Bobbarker
I love vegetable--- lovevegetable
Everything is going great---goinggreat.

used to   --- use to
I have five friends----fivfriends
I have a big kitchen----I havea bikitchen
supposed to--- suppose to
I need to go--- I neeto go
back door---
help me-- hel me
I wish she would talk to me.
Did that man know about the situation?
I could drive you there right  now.
He always seems so happy--- he alway seem so happy
I used to work crazy hours but these days I've slowed down.

#  put   y     between y/e and the initial vowel      y和e后面如果跟元音， 读音带yeah
see it ---- seeyit
carry on, we all,enjoy it
boy is


# put   w     between o and the initial vowel   类似于发音we
who is-- who wis
two hours-- twowavers
blue ocean
I'll do all of it


# as   on   at  to   for   or   our   and
content words
will  is   am  do  does
preposition

as soon as possible--- es
I'll see you on Monday---en
I'd like to talk to you----te
and ----     连读发音成 n
for---fe
our, or --- 连读发音 er
This is our house-===this is r house
in and out--- in n out
rock and roll---rock n roll
this and that---this n that
sooner or later you'll meet our parents
Do you like black and white or color photos?

# h开头的单词不在句首的话，h不发音
Did he--dide
Should he---shoulde
Would he-----woulde
I told him----------I toldm
I'll call him----------I'll callm
I'll pick them up------I'll pickem up
Drive her-----driver
Love her-----lover
ask him---- askm
I'll see him----seeyim
I'll need them---needem   th不发音
buy them-----buyem
I'll talk to him when I see him-----talk tom when I seem
He wants her to know that he loves her-----H wants er to know that he loveser.
Is that his car? ------Is that is car?
No, that's his brother's car. ------that's is brother's

# would not have------would'nve
should  not have----should'nve
could not have-------could'nve

# should have----------should've
could have ----could've
would have---would've

would you have ----- would you've

would/should/could  you  have---------would you've

How would she have known?---------how would she've known?   she?
What would you've done?-------- you've  youve  you?
you should've seen it----- should?

#
basically----basic lly
practically-----practiclly
accidentally----accidentlly
generally-------gen er lly
actually----actu lly
vegetable-----veg table  zhi
interesting-----intre sting    发音成 tr
different------diff rent
chocolate-------choc late
comfortable----comf tr able    类似于发音tr
#
aspirin-----asp n   忽略r的发音
evening----ev ning
family----fam ly
beverage----bev rage
naturally-----natur lly
miserable----mis rable
favorite----fav rite
extraordinary-----ex tra dinary
preference----pref rence
temperature------temp ture
diamond-----di mond
laboratory-----lab tory
opera----op ra
several----sev ral
camera----cam ra
broccoli-----西兰花
Every evening she takes an aspirin.

#  mispronounce
bomb,  climb, know, debt, yacht
adjust, adjective, ballet, bouquet, buffet, Chevrolet,

# th后面跟s或者es的发音   忽略th的发音
months----mons
clothes--- clo es

# 忽略p
receipt--reci t

# 忽略s
Illinois ----- Illinoi
island
debris----debri

# 忽略w
answer,

#  重读 content words, focus words
I was DRIVING
to the MARKET
to buy something to EAT.

I was watching a movie
with my friends
when suddenly it started to RAIN.

I was so tired
that I couldn't wait to get home.

If I forget to pay my BILL
please REMIND me about it

He wants to KNOW
if you NEED anything
from the SUPERMARKET.

Did you know it was SNOWING
in all parts of the East COAST?

When we CLIMBED
to the top of the MOUNTAIN
we could see the OCEAN.

#  sleepyhead
Good morning , sweetheart. Rise and shine, please get up. And breakfast is ready downstairs.
I must have slept right through it.

we'd never be able to fit all of our stuff in there.  所有我们的东西
We shouldn't miss out on this great opportunity to see your CEO in person.
             miss out on 错过 好机会                             见到本人

The one you have on is fabulous.
            穿的衣服    极好的
Sounds like I'm missing out on a good time.

Well, there is always next year.

I'm exhausted.   精疲力尽
I don't like our teacher all that much.

Boil some water and whisk some eggs.    烧水  打一个鸡蛋
gotcha---- here they are.
gas cooker-----furnace mouth     煤气灶
Here's to our friendship and health.  Bottoms up!
敬我们的友谊和健康   干杯
2 super bottles of Cola  should cover everyone.
appetizing and tasty  开胃的  好吃的
Nothing's as refreshing as iced drinks on such a hot day.  冰镇饮料  提神的 耳目一新的
mutton chops-----  eat them with sauce
can you cook them/it?
fussy  大惊小怪  小题大做
Don't be so fussy about this small thing, this is the most unexpected thing for me to see.  最不愿意看到的事情
pack sth----打包  收拾东西
Do you want your fried egg sunny-side up?     煎蛋   单煎一面蛋黄在上的煎鸡蛋

sunny side, shady side
breakfast steak,  butter your toast
fair enough       suppose--假设
I prefer the opposite.  相反的  对立的一面
The way I see it, to do the dishes is boring.   刷盘子 洗碗
Let bygones be bygones.   过去的事情就过去吧
I work so hard so I deserve to enjoy but that costs money. 值得享受 有权利享受  但是需要花钱
I make it----成功了
save money for a rainy day. 存钱以备不时之需
save 20% of all our earnings and put it in the bank.  存20%的收入在银行
It seems so far off in the future.
we'll have to work right up until the day we die.
I never thought about it that way.   从来没有那样想过
the restaurant is kind of upscale.有点上档次 高级的   dress formally 穿的正式点
need a ride,give sb a ride    搭便车
get through,get a connection,recover your service,
I had to warm it up in the garage with a heater.
The live coverage reproduced the robbery to the life.
cover the event
switch to channel 11 to watch a terrific movie without commercials.
I've been resting all day,only with the TV as my companion.  电视作伴
on the scene   当场的
a policeman on the scene said
come on stage---??
all the way up 一路上升
ticket stub  票根
so many people are crowding in  很多人聚集在
movie experience
between well-matched opponents.  棋逢对手
nostalgic   怀旧的 令人怀念的
get hands on   获得
I read everything I can get my hands on in my spare time.
I don't want to idle away and waste my time.  虚度光阴
Books are like food for the mind.  精神食粮
a large selection of songs
the echo and the stereo system
I don't need to  pay attention to the subtitles which helps a lot.  字幕
You hit the high notes perfectly.
great minds think alike.  英雄所见略同
It's really hopping.   很忙碌
more suitable for conversation
The temperature dived to ten below zero.  下降到零下十度
it really matters which cafe we go to   有关系  很重要
even number or odd number  偶数还是奇数
decimal number    十进制数
fraction  分数 小数
one half  二分之一
as you like    跟随自己的喜好
round up to   四舍五入
round decimal numbers or fractions up to the nearest whole number  四舍五入

9 minus 3 is 6.
2 adds 3 is 5.  plus, and
4 multiplied by 2 equals 8
add it all up

Don't cry over split milk.   覆水难收；不要做于事无补的事儿；别再追悔莫及了
9:00 sharp
according to lunar calendar.  阴历
to have different cultures come together and coexist. 不同文化凑到一起  共存
treat sb to dinner   管饭
It's my treat today. For the next round it's you.
今天我请客         下次轮到你
egg drop soup with laver
fine appetizer 开胃菜
vegetarian dishes 素菜
vegetarian   素食者
ice water 冰水
what would you like to drink while you wait?
freshwater fish  淡水鱼
the flavor is kind of light   口味有点清淡
the food here deserves its reputation  这的食物 名副其实
It serves great Sichuan cuisine   提供四川菜  四川美食
You said it-----
It's the house specialty and quite tasty  招牌菜   很好吃
medium rare -----
get you another drink
I feel like I owe you one ---
Go Dutch? AA制 ---- No, let me pay for the dinner. It's my pay day today.  今天发工资
I'll be with you in a moment.
How would you like your steak? rare,medium or well done?  3分熟  7分 全熟
Everything is on sale today,2-for-1 ---- 全部促销   买二送一
what size would you like?    (pizza)   多大尺寸
I like seafood on my pizzas, tuna and crab.  海鲜  金枪鱼 螃蟹
Will that be for here or takeaway?   (for here or to go?)  在这里吃 还是打包带走
That will be to go.   带走 打包
call over----  点名
Please sit over there and I will call you over as soon as it is ready.
Would yo like to supersize your meal?
For just 2 RMB more,you'll get a large Coke and fries instead of the medium.
再加两元                     大杯可乐 薯条     替代中杯
And today we are offering free toys in all the meal boxes.   餐盒
I need a haircut today, but it seems so busy. 需要理发
But how long will I have to wait?  还要等多久
hairdresser     理发师
have a shampoo
Don't cut it too short on the sides and the back,just trim it a little.
侧面不要剪太短                                      打薄一点
How about on top?  头顶怎么处理
thin  out
You can thin the top out a little
After they passed Wukesong, cycling west, the traffic pedestrians began to thin out .

When the crowd began to thin out, I realized that most of the food was still there.

dandruff  头皮屑
bothers  me a lot
I've tried several shampoos,but to no avail. 没有用
perm
I'd like to have it in big waves------
which color do you want to dye it? 染发  什么颜色
Have you got a good brand of hair dye?   染发剂 品牌
First, you need a shampoo
how much do you charge for a shampoo?  洗头
dunk your hair in the water
I blocked a shot and got it to Mike, and he took off and made this windmill dunk over Ben Coleman, who was about 6-10.
盖帽                                         起飞 起跳     大风车灌篮                                 6英尺10寸高
offensive/defensive skills   进攻 防守技能

facial   --- 面部的
blight
we are not meant to save this world.
how much you mean to me.
stratosphere
anomaly    --- ????
it is something of an anomaly.
wormhole  --- ???????
habitable  --- ?????
probe----- ??????
rudimentary    --  ???????
sarcastic

a bright spark, fan the flame  火花  煽动情绪
make fool of sb
what do you do---whade you do
My knee went out


what's up this weekend?  ---  wassup  省略t的发音

I'm going to  ---- ?? I'm gonna
  I ma nuh                 kick back
I can sleep in, slept in ------ ??
  knock on wood
I'm gonna stock up on   water/bread/food/cookies.
easy-to-eat fruit
quantum mechanics  --


Can you look it OVER for me?
I'll think it OVER and I'll call you BACK.
I can't figure OUT why it broke DOWN.
When he grew UP he moved OUT.


CHECKup   wear MAKE-up   BREAKup

CNN? PC? HTML?DVD
intonation  ---   ??
wh?, falling intonation
-----intonation changes in a sentence

I bought CHICKEN,APPLE,SUGAR and rice.

  two syllables,

apply?father  progress
object  record
I'm counting on you ------ couning on you 就指望你了
I had a LONG week ---- I ad  long
I have a new project that's taking forever.

may often find just the straw that broke the camel's back

come through the pandemic safe and sound

settle in  定居 适应新环境

It has been easy to settle in and this has allowed me to express myself and that's very important.

Employer Sponsored Migration.
Dependent family members of New Zealand citizens eligible to apply for employer nominated permanent residence in Australia.


referee or reference
be well versed in
my daily routine

demarcation
Wang Yi stressed that the demarcation in the East China Sea can only be addressed through negotiations, which are the only right choice.


====================learn how to write formal email in IELTS test===
Team,

During this global crisis, our priorities are:

?	Our People, Company
?	Our Customers, Partners, and the Industry
?	Our Culture

OUR PEOPLE, COMPANY
Our primary concern is the safety, health, and well-being of you and your families. With COVID-19 having far-reaching effects on our daily lives, it is essential that we take special care of ourselves and our loved ones. I know we are all aware and experiencing the burdens of working remotely during this time, and the company is here for you to ensure you have access to the tools, resources, and support you need.

I want to thank everyone for the tremendous effort you are making to keep our business going strong under the most challenging of circumstances. Everyone has an important role to play and is stepping up in creative and collaborative ways to support our company and our customers. Since joining the company just five weeks ago, I have truly been amazed at and extremely proud of the response and resilience of our teams around the world.

At the core of our DNA is the ability to build mission-critical capabilities. This DNA is more valuable for us now than ever before as we navigate a new normal. If we lean into the possibilities in these moments and recognize that this new normal is being created, then we can tap into the skills, mindsets, and relationships that are part of our core strengths. Be tolerant of each other and our new working environments. We will get through this difficult time together, and I’m optimistic that we can learn, adapt, and adjust so we emerge as a better, stronger, and more unified Wind River as a result of it.

OUR CUSTOMER, PARTNERS, AND THE INDUSTRY
As this crisis unfolds, Wind River’s commitment to help the world run better and improve people’s lives has never been more important. We continue to deliver solutions for mission-critical systems that help safeguard and protect the global population. To help our customers, partners, and the industry at large, we’ll be launching an important initiative early next week intended to help companies navigate and adapt to this challenging new climate, including those directly responding to the COVID-19 crisis. This is our chance to underscore Wind River’s collective and focused commitment to the industry to let them know we care and that they can count on Wind River. I’ll be sharing more details soon…stay tuned.

OUR CULTURE
Today we kick off our Wind Way monthly theme of ‘We Care.’ I can’t think of a time when this guiding principle would be more important and relevant than it is now. From our families, friends, and colleagues to our customers, partners, and communities, showing how much we care right now is more critical than ever. The team will introduce a series of initiatives in support of this guiding principle that they will be sharing with you soon.

Please take care of yourself and those around you, and we will continue to provide you with regular updates as we move forward.

All my best for the ongoing health and safety of you and your loved ones,

======================================================================

As we remain laser focused on FY20 and our ongoing growth goal, I’ve spent a lot of time working to ensure we have the right sales leadership in place to help drive our initiatives forward. To that end, I am very excited and pleased to announce that Jegan Arthanari has been promoted to Vice President, Worldwide Field Engineering.

Jegan has been part of the Wind River family for 22 years, he is a valued and trusted leader who has the passion, determination, and dedication to inspire and encourage his team, and has had a significant impact on the success of Wind River. He plays a critical role in the growth and development of his team, helping Wind River navigate complex situations like Urgent 11, and driving product requirements into our roadmap.

Always demonstrating strong leadership, Jegan has built an incredibly talented and hard-working global Field Engineering team that our customers rely on for their development of the most advanced, mission-critical systems in the world.  I am honored to have him as a partner, and look forward to his continued success.

Please join me in congratulating Jegan on this well-deserved promotion.

============================================================================
Hi Dong & Peng & Folks,

I have a suggestion and request relating to our networking
benchmarking testing, and also relating to development efforts
to improve networking performance.

In the iperf3 performance tests, we currently do not have very good
testing for receive (RX) performance.  Currently there are four tests
performed:
?	TCP 64 (RX)
?	TCP 1024 (TX)
?	TCP 65536 (TX)
?	UDP 1400 (TX)

All of the tests run between a VxWorks target (iperf3 client)
and a Linux server (iperf3 server).

Of the 4 tests, on ly the TCP 64 (RX) test involves the VxWorks target
receiving.  The linux server host sends TCP data to the client.  However,

- The test restricts sends by the server and receives by the client to 64 bytes.
- The Nagle algorithm is disabled, in an effort to avoid coalescing of sends resulting
   in full-sized segments being transmitted on the wire.
- The socket buffer sizes are left at the OS default, which means 60000 bytes
   on VxWorks.

This is not a test aimed at measuring the best receive performance
of the VxWorks target, or even measuring typical TCP receive performance.
The limitation of the send/receive size and the disabling of the Nagle algoritm
are instead handicaps aimed at stressing the RX I/O path in the stack, sockets,
and I/O layers.

To be fair, for 1Gbit/s Ethernet, I suspect that most VxWorks targets are
fast enough to support TCP receive at the rough maximum rate of  ~941 Mbit/s
so one would not see much difference amongst targets, and would also
not easily see any effect from a small stack performance gain or drop,
so long as the target could still support the line-rate limited ~941 Mbit/s.

However, this does not apply for 10Gbit/s Ethernet, where most
VxWorks targets are still CPU limited rather than wire-limited.  I think
we should add realistic TCP RX performance testing  for a selection
of VxWorks targets capable of 10Gbit/s Ethernet.  This testing should
aim at typical or best-case throughput (with MTU 1500) rather than
handicapping the system with small sends, small receives,  disabled Nagle,
and small (for 10Gbit/s) socket buffers.

[Note that the TCP 64 (RX) test also has another issue.  Disabling the Nagle
algorithm does not fully succeed in avoiding coalescing of sends by the
Linux sender.  On the wire, one sees segments that are often considerably
larger than the 64-bytes of TCP payload data per send. The Linux sender
is more successful in coalescing sends when sending against a slower
receiver, which has the perverse effect that for at least some ranges of
receiver performance, speeding up the reciever decreases the TX coalescing,
makes segments on th ewire smaller, and so decreases the actual throughput.
However, I think it is better to add a new test exercising  10Gbit/s receive by
VxWorks rather than completely getting rid of the current TCP 64 (RX) test,
although I would like to see the TCP 64 (RX) test de-emphasized.]

I think it also makes sense to add a set of tests in which VxWorks acts
as both receiver and sender.   Linux and VxWorks have different
properties as TCP senders -- in particular, VxWorks does not (yet) support
TCP segmentation offload, a.k.a. TCP large send.  It is worthwhile to
test VxWorks against not only Linux but also against VxWorks.
(Runing a TCP throughput test between two VxWorks targets
also has the benefit of simultaneously testing VxWorks sending and
receiving.)  A UDP throughput test measuring successfully received
RX throughput rather than TX throughput is another possibility.

I would suggest starting with two relatively fast, identical Intel
boards connected by Intel 82599-based NICs (tei driver) via
fibre.  The boards would be in VLM and (ideally) each could boot
into either VxWorks or linux.  Later, other targets with 10Gbit/s
capable network interfaces could be added.  We could add
TCP throughput tests between two such VxWorks targets
to our official iperf3 test repertoire.

I would like such connected target pairs available in VLM
for remote networking  development as well as for official network throughput
testing.   I have a tentative improvement in the TCP receive side on
SMP targets that in preliminary testing (on Intel targets with tei
interfaces in my WRS office), showed more than doubled TCP throughput
between the two SMP VXWorks targets.  However, I was not able to
take those targets home with me, and cannot develop on them remotely.
That's my "selfish" reason for this request; I would like to continue
that work, but currently I am not aware of such a pair of 10Gbit/s
connected targets available via VLM.

Anyhow, that's what I think would be useful for networking
performance development and testing.

Thanks,
============================================================
Hi everyone,

As we continue to expand and evolve our team and leadership capabilities to drive growth for Wind River, I am pleased to announce the following promotions on the HVP team:

 ?C Senior Member of Technical Staff
Tasos joined the HVP team in 2017, most recently serving in the position of Member of Technical Staff. This promotion recognizes Tasos’s contributions to Wind River and our team during his tenure, specifically his leadership in planning of the SC0630 release, creation of EPICs, and defining the different phases of SC0630. Now, he is going to bring his knowledge and experience to the Certification program to finish it smoothly while working as a scrum master for two teams and unblocking any hurdles and road blocks in the execution of these teams.

 ?C Member of Technical Staff
Dmitriy joined the HVP team in 2017, most recently serving in the position of Senior Engineer. This promotion recognizes Dmitriy’s contributions to Wind River and our team during his tenure, specifically the 653 parity feature enabling permission for system calls. Now, he is going to bring his knowledge and experience to HELIX product overall helping with technical debt reduction and filling in as scrum master which allows him to be a positive and active influence on the entire team.

Please join me in congratulating these individuals on this next opportunity and wishing everyone success in their new roles.

Regards,

================================================================================
Staff Software Development QA Engineer - Beijing/Sunnyvale
????Fortinet ???? Beijing, CN
Fortinet?Staff Software Development QA Engineer - Beijing/Sunnyvale??

Job Description

Title: Staff Software Development QA Engineer

Responsibilities
Function, stressing and performance testing on FNAC product
Write test checklist, test specification, bug report, etc.
Responsible for automating the test cases
Solution design and validation on integration with such as FNAC, NGFW, FAC, endpoint security product, etc.
Programing test script by Python or Shell.
Work closely with the developer to design and execute the test cases

Requirements
Bachelor's degree or above in Computer Science/Engineering or related fields.
Strong experience in network product testing and solution design or validation, especially on the network security device.
Good experience in Shell/Python script for auto testing.
Experience configuring, installing, and troubleshooting PC/server software and hardware in a Windows and Unix environment.
Good knowledge of general QA procedures and methodologies, as well as software development fundamentals
Solid knowledge in network security production or technology such as NGFW, Endpoint Security, Web Application Firewall.
Good knowledge of networking routing and switching protocols such as BGP/OSPF/VPN and also TCP/IP protocols.
Good knowledge of application layer protocol such as HTTP, DNS, Radius, SSL, DHCP, LDAP, Kerberos, SNMP.
Excellent problem solving and troubleshooting skills.
Highly motivated, positive, detail-oriented and responsible, communication skills.

Fortinet (NASDAQ: FTNT) secures the largest enterprise, service provider, and government organizations around the world.
Fortinet empowers its customers with intelligent, seamless protection across the expanding attack surface
and the power to take on ever-increasing performance requirements of the borderless network - today and into the future.
Only the Fortinet Security Fabric architecture can deliver security without compromise to address the most critical security challenges,
whether in networked, application, cloud or mobile environments.
Fortinet ranks #1 in the most security appliances shipped worldwide and more than 440k customers trust Fortinet to protect their businesses.
Learn more at http://www.fortinet.com, the Fortinet Blog, or FortiGuard Labs.

Fortinet is an Equal Opportunity employer.

We will only notify shortlisted candidates.

Fortinet will not entertain any unsolicited resumes, please refrain from sending them to any Fortinet employees or Fortinet email aliases. Should any Agency submit any resumes to Fortinet, these resumes if considered, will be assumed to have been given by the Agency free of any related fees/charge.

======================================Bill Gates blog
There’s no question the United States missed the opportunity to get ahead of the novel coronavirus. But the window for making important decisions hasn’t closed. The choices we and our leaders make now will have an enormous impact on how soon case numbers start to go down, how long the economy remains shut down and how many Americans will have to bury a loved one because of COVID-19.

Our foundation has been working to slow the outbreak for several months. To date, we’ve invested $105 million in efforts to create new therapeutics, expand access to testing, and limit the virus’s impact here in Seattle.

As a result of this work, I’ve spoken with experts and leaders in Washington and across the country. It’s become clear to me that we must take three steps.

First, we need a consistent nationwide approach to shutting down. Despite urging from public health experts, some states and counties haven’t shut down completely. In some states, beaches are still open; in others, restaurants still serve sit-down meals.

This is a recipe for disaster. Because people can travel freely across state lines, so can the virus. The country’s leaders need to be clear: Shutdown anywhere means shutdown everywhere. Until the case numbers start to go down across America?which could take 10 weeks or more?no one can continue business as usual or relax the shutdown. Any confusion about this point will only extend the economic pain, raise the odds that the virus will return, and cause more deaths.

Second, the federal government needs to step up on testing. Far more tests should be made available. We should also aggregate the results so we can quickly identify potential volunteers for clinical trials and know with confidence when it’s time to return to normal. There are good examples to follow: New York state recently expanded its capacity to more than 25,000 tests per day.

There’s also been some progress on more efficient testing methods, such as the self-swab developed by the Seattle Coronavirus Assessment Network, which allows patients to take a sample themselves without possibly exposing a health worker. I hope this and other innovations in testing are scaled up across the country soon.

Even so, demand for tests will probably exceed the supply for some time, and right now, there’s little rhyme or reason to who gets the few that are available. As a result, we don’t have a good handle on how many cases there are or where the virus is likely headed next, and it will be hard to know if it rebounds later. And because of the backlog of samples, it can take seven days for results to arrive when we need them within 24 hours.

This is why the country needs clear priorities for who is tested. First on the list should be people in essential roles such as health-care workers and first responders followed by highly symptomatic people who are most at risk of becoming seriously ill and those who are likely to have been exposed.

The same goes for masks and ventilators. Forcing 50 governors to compete for lifesaving equipment?and hospitals to pay exorbitant prices for it?only makes matters worse.

Finally, we need a data-based approach to developing treatments and a vaccine. Scientists are working full speed on both; in the meantime, leaders can help by not stoking rumors or panic buying. Long before the drug hydroxychloroquine was approved as an emergency treatment for COVID-19, people started hoarding it, making it hard to find for lupus patients who needed it to survive.

We should stick with the process that works: Run rapid trials involving various candidates and inform the public when the results are in. Once we have a safe and effective treatment, we’ll need to ensure that the first doses go to the people who need them most.

To bring the disease to an end, we’ll need a safe and effective vaccine. If we do everything right, we could have one in less than 18 months?the fastest a vaccine has ever been developed. But creating a vaccine is only half the battle. To protect Americans and people around the world, we’ll need to manufacture billions of doses.

Without a vaccine, developing countries are at even greater risk than wealthy ones, because it’s even harder for them to do physical distancing and shutdowns. The further down the income ladder people live, the more important it is that they go to work every day just to feed their family.

If they live in the poorest parts of sub-Saharan Africa or India, staying home simply isn’t an option. Even if they do stay home, they can’t just wall themselves off from their neighbors; in slums, the houses are packed together so closely that there’s no way to keep your distance. All the work that rich countries are doing now to develop vaccines will save lives in those places, too.

We can get a head start on manufacturing all of the doses we’ll need now by building the facilities where these vaccines will be made. Because many of the top candidates are made using unique equipment, we’ll have to build facilities for each of them, knowing that some won’t get used. Private companies can’t take that kind of risk, but the federal government can. It’s a great sign that the administration made deals this week with at least two companies to prepare for vaccine manufacturing. I hope more deals will follow.

In 2015, I urged world leaders in a TED talk to prepare for a pandemic the same way they prepare for war?by running simulations to find the cracks in the system. As we’ve seen this year, we have a long way to go. But I still believe that if we make the right decisions now, informed by science, data, and experience of medical professionals, we can save lives and get the country back to work.

A version of this post originally appeared on the website of the Washington Post.

==============================a good email template in office===
Dear xxxx,

The past few weeks have been heartbreaking for America, and a reminder that in 2020 we still live in a country with systemic racial inequality.

I have heard from many of you that have been deeply moved by these events. I wanted to take this opportunity to share a few thoughts with you.

My prayers and condolences go to the families of George Floyd, Ahmaud Arbery, Christian Cooper, and Breonna Taylor as the most recent victims, along with the communities that are being impacted by violence and hate.

When I see the faces of these victims, I see my three young sons and I’m reminded that just like their father they unfortunately will continue to be judged not by their character, but by the color of their skin. While the recent news events highlight the inequality from a law enforcement perspective, the problem unfortunately is “systemic,” where African Americans continue to be disadvantaged in terms of law enforcement and employment opportunities, particularly in tech, financial services, and healthcare.

In this day and age, we should not have to experience, or have our children, colleagues, friends or people we do not even know experience the worst of human behavior. A well-known African proverb says, “If we want to go fast, go alone. If we want to go far, go together.” We are collectively much better than this, and we must do better.

I am honored and proud to lead a company with a culture that truly cares about its people and communities, with a commitment to diversity and inclusion. Now more than ever, it is critical for us to stand united with one common interest ?C to make this a more just world for all by standing against inequality. As one Wind River team, we must be conscious of our biases, as well as uphold a standard of care and respect in both words and actions that lives up to our values and cultural attributes.

In the midst of a worldwide pandemic and economic crisis, we are already going through a tremendously challenging period, so please support each other, and know that you are not alone. It's important that we feel comfortable talking openly and listening respectfully on topics of race and justice at work, and that we show compassion and empathy. It’s also important that we take care of ourselves, and Wind River has resources to support mental health with our Employee Assistance Program (EAP).

We may not be able to mend all the broken parts of our society immediately, but we have a collective responsibility to be part of the solution to creating a better world by being the best versions of ourselves and bringing about change for equality and belonging. Stay informed and be part of the conversation. We are thinking through ways we can do more here too, and we welcome and encourage your thoughts.

Thank you for your continued commitment and dedication during this very challenging time, and please continue to keep yourselves and your loved ones safe.

Best Regards,

================= 2019.5-8 topic

Part 2 & 3 Topic Cards and Questions


??[Including totally new topics as well as the ones that come back to the topic pool again]

??1. A Historical Building

??2. A Park/Garden

??1. A Historical Building

??Describe a historical building you have visited.

??You should say:

??where it was

??what it looked like

??what you learned there

??and explain why you visited this historical building

??Part 3

??Historical Buildings

??Do people in your country like to / often visit historical buildings?

??Do children like to go to that kind of place?

??Do people from your country like to visit historical buildings in foreign countries?

??Are there any historical buildings in your hometown?

??Do you think people who damage historical relics should be put in prison?

??Would people in your country agree to use government funds to preserve historical buildings?

??Cities

??In your opinion, which are (the) better places to live in, big cities or small cities?

??2. A Park/Garden

??Version A

??Describe a park/garden you have been to.

??You should say:

??where it was

??when you went there

??what you did in the park/garden

??and explain how you felt about the garden/park.

??Version B

??Describe a time when you enjoyed visiting a park/garden.

??You should say:

??what it was

??where and why you visited it

??what it looked like

??and explain why you enjoyed visiting.

??Part 3

??Parks in general

??What benefits can a park bring to a city?

??Would you say people should help maintain public gardens?

??Do young people often go to a park?

??Plants

??Can you suggest whey some people plant flowers at home?


??[Repeated topics from January-April, 2019]

??3. A Faraway Place

??4. Your Ideal Home

??5. A New Public Facility

??3. A Faraway Place

??Describe a faraway place, such as a city or a country, which you would like to visit.

??You should say:

??what place it is

??how you would go there

??what you would do there

??and explain why you would like to visit this place.

??Part 3

??Holidays (vacations) in Your Country

??Do people in your country like to have holidays?

??What do people like to do during their holidays?

??What do people of your age usually do during their holidays?

??Can you suggest why some people prefer to stay at home during their holidays?

??Why do you think people who work need a long vacation every year?

??How many days would you say would be enough as a vacation for most working people?

??Travel

??What are the most popular tourist destinations in your country?

??Where do people in your country like to travel?

??Do you think that people living in different places (countries) have different temperaments?

??Why are some people unwilling to travel abroad?

??Do people in your country like to join tour groups?

??Would you (or, do you) prefer to join a tour group, or travel with a friend?

??A Gap Year

??Can you suggest why some young people choose to have a one-year break after graduation before starting work?

??Do you think that's a good idea? / Is this idea common in your country?

??What are the benefits of young people choosing a year off (a gap year) between high school and university?

??If you were a parent, would you allow your child to take a gap year?


??[Including totally new topics as well as the ones that come back to the topic pool again]

??1. A Band or Singer

??2. A Famous Foreign person

??3. Someone who is Good at Languages

??4. A Friend who Encouraged You

??5. A Person with Interesting Ideas

??6. A Person who Likes Helping Others

??1. A Band or Singer

??Describe a band or singer who you like.

??You should say:

??what style of songs they sing / music they play

??when you listen to them

??where you listen to them

??and explain why you like this band or singer.

??Possible follow-up questions:

??Have you ever been to one of their concerts?

??Part 3

??Music in Your Country

??What kinds of music are popular in your country?

??What kinds of music do you think will be popular in the future?

??Do you think people like different kinds of music at different stages of their lives?

??Singing

??Do you think people need to learn how to sing (or is it a natural skill)?

??What would you say are the benefits of singing?

??Professional Singers

??Do singers make lots of money?

??Would you say that popular singers are also good singers?

??What do you think makes a singer attractive to people?

??What do you think of the current "boy bands"?

??What influences do singers have on people?

??Songs

??Why do you think some songs become popular while other songs are not often heard?

??What do you think makes (or causes) a song to become popular?

??2. A Famous Foreign person

??Describe a famous person, not from your country, who you would like to meet.

??You should say:

??where this person comes from

??how you first learned about him or her / how you know about this person

??why / how this person is famous

??and explain why you would like to meet this person

??Part 3

??Fame and Influence

??How do people become famous?

??What does "famous" mean to you?

??What are the situations when people become famous?

??What do you think are the benefits and drawbacks of being famous?

??What are the influences of famous people over the society?

??What are the influences of famous people over the young people?

??Can you suggest why some celebrities can stay famous for a long time?

??3. Someone who is Good at Languages

??Describe a person you know who speaks a foreign language well.

??You should say:

??who this person is

??what language(s) he/she knows

??what he/she uses this language (or these languages) for        .

??and explain why you think he/she learned it well.

??Part 3

??Learning a Foreign Language

??Which do you think is easier, writing or speaking a foreign language?

??Do you think if it’s possible to learn a language perfectly?

??Would you say learning a foreign language is important?

??Who do you think learns a language faster, children or adults?

??What benefits for one's career does knowledge of foreign languages bring?

??Languages in the World

??Do you think that English will become the most commonly used language in the world?

??Do you think foreigners will be learning your language in the future?


??[Repeated topics from January-April, 2019]

??7. Someone You Wanted to be Similar To

??8. An Intelligent Person

??9. A Beautiful or Handsome Person

??10. An Interesting Old Person

??7. Someone You Wanted to be Similar To

??Describe a person who you wanted to be similar to when you were growing up.

??You should say:

??who this person was

??how you knew (about) this person / what relationship you had with this person

??what impressed you about this person

??and explain why you wanted to be similar to this person.

??or

??and explain in what ways you wanted to be similar to this person.

??Possible follow-up questions:

??Are you similar to that person now?

??Part 3

??Role Models

??In general, what kinds of people do children and teenagers want to be similar to when they grow up?

??Can you explain how the use of movie stars in advertisements influences (young) people?

??Would you say these influences are positive?

??Do you think if there are any negative influences?

??Do you think celebrities should be used in advertising to endorse products?

??Do you think celebrities have a responsibility to set a good example for young people?

??Would you say the influence of parents on their children today is as strong as it used to be in the past?

??Generational Differences / Changes

??In general, how do you think the current generation of young people in your country (e.g., born after 1990) is different to previous generations?

??Would you say these differences are a positive development?

??Do you think children (or, young people) are happier than those in the past?

??Do you think it's easier today for children to learn new things?

??Has the role of parents changed, compared to the past?


??[Including totally new topics as well as the ones that come back to the topic pool again]

??1. A Call You Received

??2. A Time You Stayed with Your Friends

??3. A Time You Got Up Early

??4. A Time Your Vehicle Broke Down

??5. You Used the Internet to Solve a Problem

??6. Something You Found Lost by Your Friend

??7. A Child who Made You Laugh

??8. An Ideal Holiday

??9. A Time You Gave Advice to someone

??10. Incorrect Information

??11. An Invitation to Dinner

??1. A Call You Received

??Describe a time you received a call from someone you don't know.

??You should say:

??when it was

??where you were when you received it

??what the call was about

??and explain how you felt (after) when you received this call.

??Part 3

??Speaking loudly in public

??Why do you think some people talk loudly on public transport?

??Do you think it's good to talk loudly on public transport?

??In your opinion, would it be a good idea to have laws prohibiting speaking loudly in public?

??Rules in Public Places

??What kinds of rules would you say are important in public places?

??Why do some people always break rules in public places?

??2. A Time You Stayed with Your friends

??Describe a time when you stayed with your friends.

??You should say:

??where you went to

??who were with you

??what you did together.

??and explain how you felt when staying with friends.

??Part 3

??Family versus Friends

??Do people spend more time with their family or friends?

??What are the main differences between staying with family and friends?

??Relationship

??Do people prefer being with a large group of people or with a few friends?

??Do science and technology improve the relationship between people?

??3. A Time You Got Up Early

??Describe one morning when you got up very early.

??You should say:

??when you got up

??what you did during the morning

??why you got up so early

??and explain how you felt about getting up so early.

??Part 3

??Sleep

??Can you think of any other occasions when people have to get up early?

??What effect would sleeping late have on one’s life?

??What kinds of jobs require people to get up early?

??What do you think are the benefits of getting up early?

??Can you suggest why some people like to get up early?

??Do you think old people find it easier to get up early than young people?

??What time do people usually get to bed (in your country)?

??Do people (in your country) usually (or, like to) have a nap in the middle of the day?

??What do you think are the benefits of having a nap?

??Working and Studying Times

??What do you think of people who work night shifts?

??Do you think it's better for young people to study in the morning, or in the evening?

??4. A Time Your Vehicle Broke Down

??Describe a time when a vehicle was broken during travelling.

??You should say:

??who was with you

??what problem it had

??how you solved the problem

??and explain how you felt when there was a problem with it.

??Part 3

??Travel

??Who do you think like to travel more, young people or old people?

??Public Transport versus Private Transport

??What do you think needs to be improved in public transport?

??What are the advantages and disadvantages of private transport?

??Would you say fewer people using private cars because of improved public transport?

??5. You Used the Internet to Solve a Problem

??Describe a time when you used the Internet to solve a problem.

??You should say:

??what problem it was

??when you did this

??how long it took you

??and explain why you used the internet to solve this problem.

??Part 3

??The Internet

??What influence does the Internet have on people (individually), and the society?

??What influence does the Internet have on universities?

??Do you think libraries will disappear one day?

??What do people use the Internet for?

??Do you think it's a waste of time to "surf the internet"?

??Would you say many people waste their time "surfing the internet"?

??Would you like to study via the Internet?

??What do you think the Internet will be able to do in 10 years?


??[Repeated topics from January-April, 2019]

??12. Not the full truth

??13. Bad Service

??14. A Situation You Didn’t Have Enough Time

??15. A Change of Plan

??16. You Taught Someone Younger

??17. A Free Day

??18. A Party You Attended

??12. Not the full truth

??Describe an occasion when someone did not tell you the complete truth.

??You should say:

??who this person was

??what they told you

??what they did not tell you

??and explain why they didn't tell the full truth.

??or

??and explain how you know they didn't tell you the complete truth

??Part 3

??Telling Lies

??Would you say most people tell lies from time to time?

??In what situations do people tell lies?

??Why do some people tell lies instead of telling the truth?

??In what situations do children or young people tell lies to their parents?

??Are there situations when people tell lies with good intentions?

??Do you think such well-intentioned lies can ever have negative effects?

??Crime and The Police

??In general, what methods do police use in order to solve crimes?

??When the police are interrogating someone who they suspect has committed a crime, is there any special equipment that they can use to detect if that person is telling a lie?

??Do you think such equipment is useful?

??Do you think the use of such equipment would reduce the amount of crime that is committed?

??There are situations where several people have witnessed a crime (or seen the person who has committed a crime) but the statements that the witnesses make are not the same. Can you suggest any reasons to explain that?


??[Including totally new topics as well as the ones that come back to the topic pool again]

??1. A Game Show or Quiz Program

??2. A Water Sport

??3. A Practical Skill

??4. A Souvenir

??5. A Piece of Clothing

??6. An advertisement

??7. A Prize you would like to win

??1. A Game Show or Quiz Program

??Version A

??Describe a TV game show or a quiz program you enjoy watching.

??You should say:

??what type of program it is

??when you watch it

??what happens in this program

??and explain why you enjoy watching it.

??Version B

??Describe a TV game show or a quiz program you enjoyed watching.

??You should say:

??what type of program it was

??when you watched it

??what happened in this program

??and explain why you enjoyed watching it.

??Part 3

??Television

??Do people in your country like to watch TV?

??Why do some people like to watch TV on their computer?

??Games

??What games did you enjoy playing when you were a child?

??What games do children play nowadays?

??Are there any differences between the games children's games and adults' games?

??Why do you think children play games (or, are playing games) today?

??2. A Water Sport

??Describe a water sport you would like to try.

??You should say:

??what sport it is

??where this sport is done

??what equipment is needed to do this sport

??and explain why you would like try it.

??Part 3

??Water Sport

??What kinds of water sport are popular nowadays?

??Do you think everyone should learn how to swim?

??Places Near Water

??Can you suggest why many people like to be in (or, go to) a place near water?

??Water Transport

??Why do think transport on water was developed?

??3. A Practical Skill

??Describe a practical skill you have learned.

??You should say:

??what the skill is

??how you learned it

??how difficult it was when you were learning it

??and explain why you have learned the skill

??or

??and explain why you think the skill is useful

??Part 3

??Skills

??What would you say is the most important practical skill in modern society?

??What might be the most important skill in the future?

??What kinds of skills are difficult to learn?

??What kinds of professions require practical skills?

??4. A Souvenir

??Describe a special thing you took home from another place (you had visited).

??You should say:

??what the thing is

??when you took it home

??where you got it

??and explain why it was special to you.

??Part 3

??Souvenirs

??What souvenirs would people buy from tourist attractions?

??Pictures

??Why do people like to take photos when they are travelling?

??What are the pros and cons of taking professional cameras when travelling?


??[Repeated topics from January-April, 2019]

??8. A Friend's Success

??9. Good News

??10. A Book

??11. An Unused Thing

??12. A Special Dish

??13. Keeping Healthy

??14. A Period in History

??15. Something to Help Your Study or Work

??16. Your Grandparent's Job

??17. A Subject You Now Like

??8. A Friend's Success

??Describe an achievement of one of your friends that made you feel proud.

??You should say:

??who this friend was (or, is)

??what the success was

??how your friend achieved this success

??or

??how long you have known this friend

??and explain why you were (or, are) proud of your friend's success.

??Part 3

??Success in Your Country

??What kinds of people are considered to be successful in your society?

??How do these people become successful?

??What personal qualities do you think someone needs in order to become successful?

??Do you think a university degree is a guarantee of future success in one's career?

??Do you think people who do mental work are more likely to be successful (or viewed as successful) than people who do practical work?

??Why do you think many people fail to become successful?

??Would you say successful people are generally happier than other people?

??What are the rewards (the benefits) of success?

??How important do you think success is in life?

??Success at School

??Do you think it's possible for students to be successful?

??Do you think grades in school are the only measure of success?

??What are some examples of the different forms of success that students can have at school?

??Do you think students can be taught how to be successful?
========================================official mail-----
Our company transformation that is underway presents us with numerous opportunities, one of which is continuous learning with a growth mindset, something I’ve shared I place as a top priority.

The new Wind River journey we’re on is introducing technology and industry topics that may be new for some, and for those familiar, there are naturally different levels of knowledge and understanding. You were introduced to many of these in the Wind River Ai_Studio Lexicon that was shared.

These concepts will be critical for us all to understand, whether for conversations with customers, partners, or prospects, or just for our own personal growth and development. This provides us with a tremendous learning opportunity across the company to absorb as much of this new information as possible. I’m pleased to already see this happening, with folks expressing an eagerness to get involved and learn, but this is an area where we can all collectively push harder.

To this end, there will be a mandatory level of learning required on the ‘Core Concepts of a Digital-First World’ based on your function and role. The People Team will be following up shortly with information on access and rollout.

This continuous learning is instrumental for our collective success, so thank you in advance for leaning in and having a growth mindset.

Best Regards
